Integrity is key of being happy, it is key to truly belong to somebody and it is key to be satisfied with yourself.
and is it sick that I went out to the trash in the hall to check the bag she tossed and it seemed to have small vomit type chunks. Didn't want to get to into it though. Yuck! (But I mean REALLY? She didn't even tie up the bag. Dumb move.)
I know that God enjoys creating new things. He creates new people everyday as infants. All of my creativity comes from our Creator God, the ultimate in creative ingenuity. As a person though, I tend to get stuck in a rut. I feel that I can’t create something new because of one, big glitch. I can not forget the past. In order for me to “spring forward” in my life, I have to just let some things go. I have to make way for the new and bury what is dead and gone.
But I don't need them
it's all because they did something stupid one day,
trumped the graceless promise of
endless patterns extend to infinity
The memories will be alive in my mind and heart …. especially remembering how on one night at the hospital, he asked to be carried by me and then without any prompting, he whispered in my ear … “sayanggg mak long Hadi …”
P.S. Shandy, so that you don't miss out completely, I will make sure we take plenty of phoor-toors for you!
Total Inches Lost: 8
And we did brats. Yep. But these weren't your typical bratwurst sausages, which weigh in at a hefty 320 calories.
I also remember with humour when a couple of times people would actually stop their cars to speak to me when I was with Golden…. OK speak to Golden. Also there was an occasion when I was in Sinai and my wife was shopping in the local Penny Supermarket so I had Golden on his lead outside trying to get him to do his business when a family doing their shopping there saw Golden and all came outside with big smiles just to say hello to him.
Favorite Line: “Girl, I know you’re doing the same thing, too / But I won’t tell your man the things we do”
Consumer research of a sample of 250 college students indicates that 41% of students would probably or definitely pursue a professional programme in E-commerce, and 77% of these students would probably or definitely pursue the programme at the Pearl Academy of Fashion.
"Nah. It's just three blocks. Have a good night."
Some one had posted in one of the communites I watch on Live Journal a picture of a Rose, and I was inspired to pull one of the Roses I have on my Flickr.
Here in New Jersey, watercooler talk is all about the “New Jersey Tanning Mom,” who is accused of taking her five-year-old daughter into the tanning booth. After her arrest (and memorable mug shot) Patricia Krentsil insisted she was innocent; her daughter had gotten sunburned from playing outside, not from the tanning salon.
Things are looking up (here), beer-wise.
In Italy it is also a day to honor Fathers. And, since many men in Italy are named “Giuseppe” (Joseph) many name day “onomastico” celebrations also take place.
#80. hubby working "on the side"... so we can afford to travel
something going on so the break from "noise" is so
Article 45
Another woman has come forward claiming to have had an affair with Herman Cain. According to her, he had a preference for 69 69 69.
Dr. Mohamed Elmasry, Egyptian Canadian, retired professor of engineering University of Waterloo and former president of the Canadian Islamic Congress.
Jerrold L. Kachur, University of Alberta, Canada: The Liberal Virus in Critical Pedagogy: Beyond “Anti-This-and-That” Postmodernism and Three Problems in the Idea of Communism
1/2tsp Fennel seed powder
Please feel free to contact me.
5) All Bran Fiber Drink Mix. I'll be honest. I haven't seen these in stores in a long time. But when you mix it with a bottle of water, it tastes awesome - a pink lemonde treat. 10 grams of fiber in each packet with only 20 calories and 0g of sugar. I'm looking for a suitable replacement, so if you have any ideas, I'm all ears.
Sitting at the hospital for days,
There are many advantages to living in Australia, including to name but a few, the weather, water temperature (and if like me you were brought up on bracing dips in Loch Lomond and off the beach at St Andrews you’ll know what I’m talking about here), fabulous food and wine, great open spaces just begging to be explored, multicultural and vibrant cities and a sports mad population. I could go on for pages here but assuming you’re not a spotter for the Australian Tourism Board you’d probably rather I stopped – and if you are a spotter in search of purple prose extolling the virtues of the Great Southern Land, well I’m your woman.
Understanding to Accept Google
Areas are the measure of square units that you need to cover a surface. The formulas for areas go as followed:
His eyes lit up. I think that we have a plan, or at least a discussion.
Arsenal looked stronger and fitter within months. It wouldn’t be fair to put it all down to diet and physical preparation. There was a marked technical improvement. You could see it most in players like Ray Parlour, Stephen Hughes and the full-backs – in the way they trapped and passed the ball, in the way they moved without it and harmonised with their teammates. I’m convinced that the manager’s ability to improve players hasn’t diminished, and obviously it’s something that can’t be aped by other teams.
There was nobody home. The doors were open, unlocked, because the house was undergoing a renovation of some kind, but the owners were away, and Mister Rogers’s boyhood home was empty of everyone but workmen. “Do you think we can go in?” he asked Bill Isler, president of Family Communications, the company that produces Mister Rogers’ Neighborhood. Bill had driven us there, and now, sitting behind the wheel of his red Grand Cherokee, he was full of remonstrance. “No!” he said. “Fred, they’re not home. If we wanted to go into the house, we should have called first. Fred…” But Mister Rogers was out of the car, with his camera in his hand and his legs moving so fast that the material of his gray suit pants furled and unfurled around both of his skinny legs, like flags exploding in a breeze. And here, as he made his way through thickets of bewildered workmen–this skinny old man dressed in a gray suit and a bow tie, with his hands on his hips and his arms akimbo, like a dance instructor–there was some kind of wiggly jazz in his legs, and he went flying all around the outside of the house, pointing at windows, saying there was the room where he learned to play the piano, and there was the room where he saw the pie fight on a primitive television, and there was the room where his beloved father died… until finally we reached the front door. He put his hand on the knob; he cracked it open, but then, with Bill Isler calling caution from the car, he said, “Maybe we shouldn’t go in. And all the people who made this house special to me are not here, anyway. They’re all in heaven.”
Children do not have the reasoning ability of adults. A property owner will not escape liability because the child was trespassing.
■Pray for our Hope2Africa youth.
Read it in detail, but his conclusion makes the position clear.
Finally, certain that his only hiding place could be that towel, I bravely trampled it. Back and forth, missing nary a fiber, I trampled it. Then I trampled it again. The entire time, I remained on the lookout for a fleeing invader. Afterwards, I gingerly flipped the towel over again, searching for a crushed corpse, or a stray leg, or a wet smudge on the tile floor, anything to indicate the terminated presence of my foe.
Nahoon River to Nxarhuni River;
We are not to live for ourselves, but for Christ. The old is gone, we are new in Christ.
Levels: None that I can see
Breach of Faith: The Fall of Richard Nixon by Theodore H. White
Very cool!
This EO is about “preparedness”, but for whom?
I went blog hopping this morning and found Tyla's blog,felt like an intruder reading these blogposts but can't help myself. You can feel the pain of these poor parents. What I am most impressed about is the good that has come from their grief God it is still sad no matter which way you look at it. Please follow the link to other sites on Tyla's Blog. Tyla's Daddy died of Cancer (making it doubly as sad for her mommy)
O’Brien
What is so awful about this case is that the character in the novel, Skeeter, knows she has no book without the testimony of the maids and pays them an exact equal share of the advance she gets and any future royalties. Ablene Cooper must have brought her $75,000 compensation case at least partly because no such arrangement was made with her. (I assume).
I want clean spaces. Maybe when the kids are gone for the next two days I can get around to cleaning the playroom/guest room. We shall see.
A handful of semi-sweet chocolate chips
Democracy is messy. It requires compromise. It allows for dissent. It takes time to get things done.
I decided to simply write mine out.
Fold each blinchik in half, and then in half again, without taking it out of the skillet, then transfer to a preheated serving plate and cover with a napkin.
I found alot of other fun stuff, but I got some major junk cleaning out of the way! However, I'm sure I can get rid of some more stuff lol! What kind of fun/random things you find when doing a major cleaning?
It is publication day of the UK paperback for 'The Coward's Tale', and it is the start of a long celebration. It's been a long journey too, and this is some sort of journey's end, so let's raise a glass to lots of hard work and a little luck along the way.
Ever feel like you’re failing every day? Trying to catch up with what ever it is that you do in life only to realize that you’ve gone only from an F to an F+?
ACTIVITIES: In the senior class, I had the kids choreograph a ten-move fight scene. They split their paper into two sides, and then figured out and wrote down ten moves for each side of the battle. Then they went outside to practice and fine-tune their moves.
“I am so clever that sometimes I don't understand a single word of what I am saying.”
Skirt: Target...clearance
Think what you will about how well the film is made up until that point, the ending is a dud. What is further disappointing is one expects better from director Gregory Hoblit, who was a producer for Hill Street Blue, LA Law, and NYPAD Blue. How can a talented guy with a history of creative success drop the ball so badly with a feature film? It boggles the mind.
At 4 am on Friday 30th September 2005 Karen and I drove from away from our old lives in Surrey to start our new adventure in Provence.
But do I even WANT to overcome it? Do YOU??? ;)
Forwards DeAndre Bembry and Elijah Davis proved themselves to be next-level talents, regardless of how unheralded they might be. Bembry, a long 6-foot-6 swing-man was tasked with the thankless of job of defending Jerrett and did so admirably. While he fell way short of his 20.7 points-per-game average, he did a little bit of everything. He did about as well as anyone could on Jerrett defensively while moving the ball and picking his spots wonderfully on offense. Bembry nailed a three pointer with under five seconds left to send the game into overtime.
In specific, she says, “But you don’t become great by trying to become great. You become great by wanting to do something, and then doing it so hard that you become great in the process.”
Independent Certified Baby Signs® Instructor
Lunch is whatever we can find in the fridge/pantry or Daddy calls and we meet/pick him up and go out to eat.
They are the crown jewel of college basketball. Some would say the equal to their professional counterparts in Washington and Charlotte. New Orleans glory was destined, anything less would be uncivilized. They are a freshman quartet of Anthony Davis, Michael Kidd-Gilchrist, Marquise Teague and Kyle Wiltjer. A sophomore duo of Terrence Jones and Doron Lamb along with the selfless contributions of senior in Darius Miller. They are the favorites for tonight’s national championship game.
Wales.
I have totally been on a bookmark/tag kick lately so this was just another opportunity to make a bookmark. The challenge is to use White, Black, Gray, and Yellow with Background stamping. If you want to check out the challenge here's a link.
3)If you want your item insured or not (many foreign orders cannot be insured but can be registered) If you don't insure your order the loss will be yours.
FAST FACT: As a soldier and general, Andrew Jackson was said to be as tough as "Old Hickory," which is a very tough wood. Sadly, Andrew’s father died before he was born and his mother and two brothers died before he reached the age of 15. Orphaned and alone, Andrew had to take care of himself from a very young age, which may explain why he became such a “tough” young man.
the unexpected grip of something made
"To 1848 the proletarian challenge, to expropriate the bourgeois revolution and universalize it, make it look both backward to commoning and forward to civil liberties, is building, as it adapts certain ideas generated in the course of bourgeois emancipation.
I could see Marlene’s shoulders tensing. “I’m Marlene Drayer, and this is my friend, Lyddia Veil.” I stepped forward and tried to smile my nicest smile. It bounced off her face like a spit ball hitting a Kevlar vest and I made a note to self to whiten my dentures tonight.
Next year, if I have the 8th graders to be mixed in with either TDA A & B, we no longer need to recruit anymore students.
We've been extremely blessed with family...they might have thought we were nuts to move to Alaska, but they never said it...they might think we are nuts that after we settle into a house in Fairbanks that we decide this is not quite the place for us, yet they say nothing...when they hear that we are heading to an about 30x30 dry cabin 40 miles out of a 'proper' town they STILL don't tell us we are nuts. Instead they have been incredibly supportive and excited for us. They are honestly happy that we are getting to follow our dreams (ok, so his sis did have a moment there when the fact that there is an outhouse and no running water came out, but hey, she's a city gal thru and thru..and my mom did say she could never never never do an outhouse and no bathtub, but that's my mom LOL). My grandma (have I mentioned I'm grandma's girl), after telling me over and over how good it was to hear my voice, proceeded to think the house is an awesome idea and was full of tips on how to manage things, given the fact that she grew up with no running water in the house. She's been my bedrock my whole live and I love the fact that it tickles her to death we are getting to do this (although she bemoans the fact that I don't write and send pictures nowhere near often enough..I tend to call and she can't re-read phone calls and see pictures!!!)
You can even substitute the stamp set for any other stamp set worth up to $42.95! Offer ends May 31st! Email me at dkmui86 (at) gmail (dot) com for more information!
Several pre-existing conditions preclude the use of urine therapy. Heavy smokers and people taking therapeutic or recreational drugs should not use their own urine. Those suffering from bladder infections or venereal disease are also advised against ingesting their urine.
knowing that thou art that truth
but they do stay.
As my film discussion/review colleague, Didion of the Feminema website has just done a post on this film, and two others here, with the aim being to bring to our attention the fact that not every film is about super heroes, cops, drugs, warfare, comic books, cartoons, or sex. Some films don’t depend on a narrative plot or on dialogue. In fact, this film’s methodology is innovative and new. It crosses film with art, and art history, and that’s just the starting point. In her view this is so cutting edge that it is worthwhile to invest your time to watch these films.
#020 Mark Mulder (A's)
But is that really true? There is some evidence that reducing inequality through redistribution actually promotes wealth creation. What’s the mechanism? Sam Bowles claims to have identified one element of it:
It started out as a Daily Blend that soon evolved into one of my first Urban Fiction pieces. I had never really written Urban Fiction, let alone read it often so I was weary about the story.
To polish a diamond,
Connecting you with your Spiritual Team
Thank you for all the entries for our last challenge I will post the top 5 later on today.
in hopes that
Those in the first two categories might find this book a bit of a trial. Those in the third category will read this book with interest.
The Oracle chief sits atop a fortune that is $11.5 billion bigger than last year thanks to a 30% jump in the software company’s shares. In November Oracle won a mud-slinging copyright infringement court battle against German software rival SAP worth $1.3 billion. SAP is contesting the outcome. Oracle has acquired 75 companies over the years worth $40 billion, and figured out a way to turn a profit on its latest big buy, Sun Microsystems, in 2010. One of the highest-paid executives in the U.S., Ellison reaped $960 million in compensation in the past five fiscal years, mostly from exercising stock options; he recently cut his salary to $1. An avid yachtsman, Ellison spent a decade and over $100 million on his quest for the America’s Cup, which he finally won in February 2010, beating Swiss rival (and billionaire) Ernesto Bertarelli. He is bringing the America’s Cup to San Francisco in 2013. Intends to give 95% of wealth to charity.
Bear: I think they were. They didn’t have wings.
Who was Qualtrough?
Not only did the bombshell singe Taib’s hopes for his first-born, but should the case go to trial, details of their wealth will be laid bare to the public.
It was easily relayed without dash without dot
The Pirates get to return to the friendly confines of PNC Park, which has to be a good feeling to them. The last road trip the Pirates went on they went 3-6 but really finished strong and look to take that into this series against the world series champs St. Louis Cardinals. Charlie Morton goes for the Pirates tonight, Charlie went 5 innings in this first start of the season he just gave up five runs on seven hits. He wasn’t his Electric Stuff last time out and hope’s to do that against the Cardinals. Lance Lynn goes for St. Louis, he is 2-0 this year and has been great with a 1.50 era and 13 strikeouts. This is the first time the Pirates have seen the new cardinals without Albert Pujols, but the cardinals have still done a very good job on offense without Pujols. Yadier Molina is one of the key players in this series. Molina has always done well against the pirates and at PNC Park. The last few games have been solid for the offense led by Andrew McCutchen and Neil Walker, also Pedro Alvarez has been hitting the ball hard the last few games and will look to take advantage of the short porch at his home field. Good news for the pirates but bad for the Cardinals 1B Lance Berkman will miss the series as he was placed on the 15 day DL. Also Jon Jay left Thursday game with a shoulder problem his status for the series is unknown.
They understand people have tablets and read news on phones or Internet cafe. The same people paying for access to media are the same people leading in the social media sphere online. They have nice websites that are validated correctly, they draw in news from permission granted RSS feeds to spice up their own sites. The RSS Readers have gone from your favourite reader to your own homepage.
‘Waltz King’ offers only its original English track, but thankfully is subtitled, a nice change from other earlier Generation titles. Unfortunately the film is not closed captioned, and the yellow captions have a habit of blending in with the print’s yellow-red tone.
About two months ago I decided to take a Copics class. I have been wanting to try them out for awhile and I was able to make a beginner's class at Memories Live On. I really enjoyed my class and I have been getting a marker whenever I can. In the class we were able to use a My Favorite Thing (MFT) Stamp and I just loved the little figures in the sets and I love the cute little sentiments that come along with them.
Of a Neocomian shore.
Truthfully...... a few days later I can't even tell the difference. haha.
2 oranges, squeezed
And again, it's raining outside. No suprise. Hurricane season is no fun for anyone... and it's a shame because September is one of my favorite months here in the Northeast; sun-soaked days in the 70s, flip flops and jeans. My September was held hostage by rain, and now it's October. Perfect weather at night to sit around the fire with friends.
· He wanted no one to rejoice over the death of Saul
Noticing:
Still, many other carriers, like Japan Airlines or Jet Airways of India, are very close to getting all they need from Britain, which regulates hundreds of airlines, including Emirates and DHL Air U.K., in the system, which is administered by E.U. member states.
Rating: 2 out of 5 boxes
A couple days later we see one more funeral. We pass it on the road and just decide to take a look. This is a very large event for some government official. There are hundreds of people, all of whom will need grub. When we arrive they are having formal processions of visitors to the family. There are so many pigs lying on the ground tied to bamboo stakes waiting for their destiny with the knife while more are coming in by trucks. Having no real desire to see more blood-letting, we leave soon and take a ride in the beautiful countryside.
The cry station has remained. It’s been an excellent test to see how sad someone really is, because oddly enough, when given the chance to bellow things out, they rarely do. Turns out, it’s not that much fun.
“I want to cry, don’t want to leave the office and I can’t help but think about how pathetic and lonely I am even though I’ve got a family and friends and a cat. I don’t understand what’s going on?”
He gets up on the exam table and starts to get worried. The very nice nurse tells him to squeeze my hands with his. Ouch! Strong kid, but that's fine. And then she says, "OK, all done!" And he says, "Really?"
Although you can't tell from the photo, the image, trophies and verse are all mounted with foam pads to give a bit more dimension. The little shirt was cut by hand and mounted using a little hanger that I made from a paperclip!
Breckenridge - Christmas Ale
-expert belt
Haunted Stars: Show Business And The Supernatural
(Off topic. I originally posted this on The American Catholic, and I thought our Almost Chosen People readers might like it.)
On return to the Palace, she appeared on the balcony, where she was cheered by huge crowds. In the Ballroom she distributed Jubilee brooches to her family. In the evening, she put on a splendid gown embroidered with silver roses, thistles and shamrocks for a banquet. Afterwards she received a long procession of diplomats and Indian princes. She was then wheeled in her chair to sit and watch the fireworks in the garden.
What I found truly absorbing was how much of our culture, heritage, and sense of community has been lost in exchange for the convenience of the modern food industry. Food and community have always been inextricably linked, and removing the sense of community is having just as damaging an effect on our health as a species as the toxins we are consuming as part of a "conventional" diet. The same is true for the other aspects of our lives that are human needs. Breathing, eating, sheltering and clothing ourselves, if we have let go of our connection to these needs being fulfilled... if we have reached a point where the label in our jeans is more important to the physical, emotional, and way they are affecting our very selves... what is left of the humanity in our species?
If the man (or woman) in your life can fell a grown bear at 10 paces after breaking wind, this is the ultimate way to say 'I love you.'
Okay here is the Coke and Pepsi story LOL and about time to I hear you shout, all my one and a half readers LOL
Talk to your bride and make sure your hairstyle doesn’t clash with her chosen style of wedding and ask what hair styles the other bridesmaids are wearing to get a good feel for what you should choose for your own personal style. These on-trend styles are a great go-to style for your day as a bridesmaid, so let us know which is your personal favorite too.
1. The use of Google Earth to take us on her journey was such a wonderful presentation tool. It seemed to give her a nice time-line and thus Roz never seemed flustered or even confused by just telling her story. The smoothness and at-ease feeling she portrayed during the evening was quite amazing. She was soothing and yet made you so empowered by her heroic life’s tales.
She enjoyed spending time with the little girl we met on Monday night. She's also new and her name is Elizabeth so Teagan was excited to have a friend with a name matching Mommy's.
It is idiotic to play like that because you’re having only a tiny portion of the fun and satisfaction that you’ll get from a good game, playing by the rules.
I thought that this quote was just PERFECT, so I made it into a WordArt for you all! Hope you like it :) Click on the links below to go to my accounts to download the PNG file, and leave some love if you like my work. thanks!
The Refugee Council has backed the petition for screening units in Scotland and also called for more elsewhere in the UK. Chief executive Donna Covey said: "Having no choice but to travel to Croydon to claim asylum is both impractical and unjust for people, some of whom are based as far as Scotland, north or south-west England, and who include pregnant women and those with mobility difficulties. "Most people claiming asylum will be unable to afford the travel fares, so must rely on friends and charities to help them out. "Once they get there, we know a number of our clients are forced to sleep on the streets if there is a delay with their appointment as they have nowhere else to go. The situation is unsustainable." You know what’s unsustainable, Donna? Having more offices dotted round the country, with more civil servants employed to staff them, just so that someone who has snuck into the country underneath a lorry or squashed into a container isn’t subjected to the ‘indignity’ of the UK rail system…
So screw tone. No reasonable person is going to fault you for being angry about racism. Those who do, those who expect you to be not only sweet and calm but to value their feelings over your own are closed-minded jerks. You might want to give them a piece of your mind, but do not fool yourself into thinking you can reason with them: they have already placed themselves beyond reason. (…)
And because I know some of you are going to ask...here's the gist of it...
For my card, I've made the base out of yellow bazzill using Fleur de Lis Rectangle Nestabilities - however bazzill is very thick, next time I would use a thinner cardstock! Next I stamped the Lattice Background in light brown ink and coloured the inner squares of the lattice with B000 Copic Marker and cut it to size. Around this I've attached some Seam Binding and glued it down. I've added a little pearl flourish to the top left corner, after all we all need a little bling right?? For my feature panel, I've stamped the sentiment and frame from Spring Rose Medallions in Memento Tuxedo Black onto X-press It Blending Card and coloured with Copic Markers (B0000, B01, YG13, YG17, Y21, Y35, Y38) and cut it out with Nested Oval Medallion Label Dies. I've framed this with another piece of yellow bazzill, cut with Labels 11 Nestabilities and popped it all up on High Tack Foam Tape. I've finished with a simple bow.
So I was single parenting from Friday on. A was so afraid to get Baz or me sick that he was wearing a mask and sanitizing every time he coughed, so if I was home he would try not to touch Baz at all. Super, super frustrating to have a parent in the room but not able to say, stop the baby from throwing his lunch on the floor. Then A had to leave for a four day conference 7 hours away. Which he had put on the calendar as 'Field Trip' to distinguish it from all the other multi-day work commitments on our calendar. Suffice it to say that we only realized that he would be gone, and I'd need childcare coverage, when he started to recover on Sunday morning. Scrambling for sitters! Yay!
Learn how to can, freeze and dehydrate foods for food storage.
Just so you know I was working on a Design Team card so that is why so much stuff is out.
A quick half of Anchor Porter and a chat with some beery acquaintances, and then home. I perused the latest Cockney Kevin missive on the way, learning both my North London stops have received local Camra branch pub of the year awards, with Cask Pub & Kitchen making it a hat-trick. I guess the new wave of beer bars and free houses selling lots of delicious local beers will continue to give the tied and chain pubs a run for their money when it comes to awards. Hopefully it'll encourage the big boys to buck their ideas up when it comes to beer offer.
Of course, mistakes might creep in. As an example, when Sarah Palin recently spoke about Paul Revere warning the British with bells and shots, some tea party supporters went to Wikipedia and edited the article about Paul Revere’s Ride so that it more smoothly coincided with Palin’s description. Yet other folk, from Revolutionary War scholars to armchair historians, were right there to change things back. Over time, Wikipedia proves itself incredibly accurate.
So I stand by my outrage: there’s something smelly about this “misunderstanding”, and something peculiar about what the school is doing.
This is the weather the shepherd shuns,
Go camping, out in the wild. Take a friend or a group of friends, pack some great food and head out into the moutains for a 2-3 day journey. Get back to nature, and forget about technology. If you’re like me, you’ll enjoy the relaxation and the lack of technology.
Applicant contended, however, that FIORE "has an alternative, recognized meaning: it means 'flower' in Italian," and it submitted evidence that "Italian is increasingly popular as a language for study and practice in the United States, such that a 'beginner word' like 'flower' would be readily understood by a wide variety of people."
Shonna is on the left (making a heart with her hands), then Jacinta and Robin with Renee behind. I'm next to Robin. Scan right, past the lady in the green shirt, to Mary and Diana, grinning madly, with Ginger behind, Donna next to Ginger, and Donna's daughter Hannah next to her. I don't see Hannah's husband, Craig, but maybe I'm missing him. Let me know if you spot him, James pals.
“Go deep now Shaun. Deeper yet. As I count to five you go deeper one. You are in control of your emotions two, deeper now three. Deeper in harmony Shaun. Deeper in the truth. Deeper four, deeper in strength; quite the opposite of what people think. Deeper and five. You are in total control Shaun. No one can hypnotize you on accident. You can only be hypnotized at your request Shaun.”
Not surprisingly, Rev. May clarified for anyone who didn’t know it, just who were the targets of all this attention. It happened to be those “suburban (white) kids,” he said, who must be brought to understand what they have “in common” with the ethnics.
Paperback: 356 pages
The girl and, yes, Birdman, too. If some strange girl from California started sending me letters and sexy pictures, I'd be instantly skeptical and I'm not even rich or famous. What was Bird thinking?
Republicans have a golden opportunity in the April 24 primary to nominate a man who fully understands that sound economics is sound economics and benefits all socioeconomic classes.
But I am pretty sure it was a crazy fool. It was freezing and they were repelling down from a tent that was literally hanging on the side of the mountain face at least a thousand feet.
It's that time of the year, when they suddenly behave more like siblings than classmates. They have spent a lot of time together and it's starting to wear on them and to be honest, me too! Listening to them argue over the littlest things is tiring and the tattling has suddenly become relentless. I hated to do it, but once again I've had to pull out....the tattle jar.
I feel like I've spent half my time in the car this week, shuttling K-boy and M-girl back and forth to drama. Their performance venue is over a half hour drive from our home, so the car hours have added up quickly.
This might surprise you, but I believe in school uniforms whether they are enforced at private or public schools. Anything that stops the great clothing race of the pre-teen set and focuses them back on learning, sounds like a good thing to me. Now, I draw the line when it comes to the Little Man Tate outfit for boys – you know, the school uniform with the shorts. Though I think it’s ultra-cute (I have eyes, after all) – I feel that dressing a young male in this type of attire is akin to putting a puppy in a sweater. Yes, it’s adorable, but it’s obvious that the puppy hates it. (If you are British, throw this rule out the window completely. For some unknown, cultural, reason this outfit works for British school children. Everyone else – KNOCK IT OFF.)
Levy was good as the priggish and fastidious Robespierre, the one historical figure for whom I retain a particular loathing, but not nearly as good as Newman in the part of Saint-Just, as chilly a fanatic who ever lived, in many ways the real agent of the Terror, with none of the self-doubt of his mentor.
"Good."
It is through an open heart chakra we connect with others. When we approach someone from our heart it is difficult for them to misinterpret our communication. An open heart trusts self and others and that is communicated clearly. An open heart is open to receiving love as well as to giving love. The receiving part is more difficult for many. It is important to acknowledge that receiving is an integral part of the flow of love through us. This is part of the generous spirit that is an “open heart”; the give and take of life lived in a peaceful, kind and thoughtful way towards others as well as towards self.
FBI transcripts verify that bin Laden, according to testimony by former FBI translator Sibel Edmonds, was working for the US at that time and had maintained contact with his CIA handlers through the fateful summer of 2001.
Kidz City has other activities coming up very soon. It seems like the organizing with DIY Fest has been going really well, and the kids program looks amazing.
And God would bid His warfare cease,
Coconut Fig bars (these have been a favorite of my children) There is no sugar! And my kids eat them up!
The eventual passage of the Immigration Act of 1924 was not the work of a fringe of hysterical xenophobes. It was the culmination of a long process of failed integration, crime, social unrest, political breakdown, and ethnic tensions that were the direct result of allowing un-absorbable numbers of aliens into an Anglo-Protestant nation.
While Kṛṣṇa was away in Hastinapura his wives instinctively sat down and entered a meditative trance, withdrawing their consciousness from the ordinary plane of existence. In this yogic trance they continued to enjoy Kṛṣṇa’s company without interruption. Now that he returned they immediately gave up this meditation and embraced him on the tangible plane.
I'd like to do something awesome like skydiving. Or go zip lining again! (Oh, I didn't tell you about that. Maybe later)
This leaves us at this crossroads then: how can we be happy in this life and also happy in the next life, too? Well, that is fairly straightforward and easy. We need to store up our treasures, but make sure that they are in the right house, and not the one here on Earth. Money has made it’s was into being as sovereign as God is in our lives whether we want to admit it or not. The verbiage that my pastor used this Sunday that I also had in my notes was the word ‘it.’ We are always looking for ‘it.’ ‘It’ can be anything: stuff, money, cars, homes, wives, husbands, toys, games, guns, or anything that we seek out. Well, I propose to you that ‘It’ needs to start becoming Jesus. Jesus is the only ‘it’ that when we seek, we will be glorified. He is ‘it.’ The alpha, omega, beginning and end. If His grace truly is sufficient enough for us as He has promised, then why can we not just turn a blind eye to money for a while, and try Jesus? I think we would get farther ahead than we are now. And to be honest, this is a problem that effects both Christians and non-Christians alike. It is not global, but as far as what the average person reading this sees, it may as well be. Christ liked to speak in parables, and that was the second idea that I had on paper. Matthew is my favorite book in the Bible, and one of the many reasons it is deals with Christ’s teachings. As I have stated before, he was kind to the sinner, and harsh to the “religious elite” of His time. My favorite part of Matthew would have to revolve around choosing good soil to build on. In Matthew 7:24-27, Jesus says:
That the GMC and other medical licensing authorities are not doing anything about torturing patients tells you a lot about the power of the CDC and the CBT psychiatrists.
Off the needles and just in time!
Support was from Plastic Rose, a young Irish band who were pretty good but let down with equipment issues and clearly just bowled over to be playing a venue like the O2 - their last gig in London had been to 15 people! Everything Everything up next, now good sound, great vocals at times but poor at others, great musicianship but ... I don't get them at all. It all seems to need something else for me but D-o-F liked them.
Things given up for Lent – Three – Chocolate, cakes and biscuits.
Is the fire hot? - Hot as fire - the cold stuff has not yet been invented.
~ Frank et al
Please send us four items: 2 x card samples 2 x layout samples.
Taos New Mexico by Waylon Jennings
There are over 200 varieties of avocados (Persea americana) grown on Hawaii. Native to Mexico and Central America, avocadoes grow very well in orchards, but also wild in low elevation wet forests. It was likely introduced in the early 1800s. The tree has large, evergreen, alternate pointed oval leaves, and is easily recognized when bearing fruit. The avocados can be pear-shaped or round, mostly dark green, with smooth or pebbly skin. The ripe fruit is bright green and not sweet, more of a buttery, nutty, and smooth flesh. There is one large, oval seed in the middle of the fruit. We saw many trees in the forests of Kauai, but the best place to find some fantastic avocadoes is at the Sunshine Markets around the island of Kauai. There were several different varieties to sample and buy for $1.00-$3.00 each, incredibly cheap for local, truly ripe fruit.
Nine years ago when I put this bike together it was state-of-the-art. Now, it’s practically an antique:
When my children were very little, I used to put them into the nursery at my gym every morning – instead of working out I’d go to the café with my laptop. At least half of Underground was written that way.
Who but God knew that I would endure those upside-down events in college? Those events include the day I bawled for the first time during my internship year due to feelings of being overwhelmed and not completing my goals to my personal standards, the day I got in a car accident and it was my fault, the day I found out my grandfather had lung cancer, and the MANY days I realized I cannot do anything without the strength of Christ.
No, I shouldn’t, I couldn’t, I wouldn’t!
And in the world to roam;
Hope you like the cards and thanks for stopping by.
The Snake is one of the symbols of Thoth.
6. If you request an extension of time to file by the tax deadline and you paid at least 90 percent of your actual tax liability by the original due date, you will not face a failure-to-pay penalty if the remaining balance is paid by the extended due date.
Does your community publish a newsletter?
USA and Canada residents only please.
I feel quite fortunate to be able to connect in this way with others around the globe who are making felt, and feeling about the process and the material as I do. How else would I be likely to see the work of a felter in Spain, short of going there?
Have a good night! :)
-BROGUE KICK OUT OF NO WHERE!!!!! Sheamus crawls…..1..2….KICKOUT!!!!
Don't forget that the random prize patrol is watching so leave a comment on every blog to be eligible for the prizes!! The more blogs you comment on, the better your chances are of winning something fun!
We're officially grown-ups now! We'll have to wait until we have that empty nest to get the two seater Porsche.
“Away with such a fellow from the earth. It is not fit that he should live.”
Have a go: Draw. The poorest of Rovers teams were always capable of getting a result in Turners Cross, but the best in the land might have to settle for a share of the spoils in this clash.
“The nights where there are more fans for the opposing team than ours won’t happen in Brooklyn,” Nets CEO Brett Yormark told the Daily News. “We’ll have diehard fans that are going to grow up as Brooklyn Nets fans.”
A reader of mine, Dana, needs some help with her research. If you fit her criteria and wouldn't mind participating by answering 15 questions, I'd be much obliged.
Dean Francis Alfar - L’Aquilone du Estrellas (The Kite of Stars) ***: A girl falls in love with a young astronomer, but he's so obsessed with the stars that he doesn't notice her, so she asks the greatest kite-maker in the city to build a kite that she can fly on. He tells her this is impossible, but when she insists he gives her a list of necessary parts. She then embarks on a quest that takes her half a century and around the world to complete.
Parents asking questions about vaccine safety is nothing new. Although in the past decade there has been a focus on whether a mercury preservative in vaccines, perhaps in combination with the MMR vaccine, can cause autism in some children, the public conversation about vaccine risks and flaws in vaccine science and policy began in the early 1980’s. 5 Back then, it was parents of DPT vaccine injured children calling for a less toxic whooping cough vaccine to replace an old one causing brain inflammation, brain damage and death.
Onto the details.
My favorite espionage TV show is “Danger Man” with Patrick McGoohan, which later morphed into “Secret Agent”. The show takes place during the 1960s, right at the height of the Cold War.
Is He trustworthy?
In any case, I hope some dedicated and experienced web sleuths who read Gates of Vienna will take up the challenge and look into Mahareen Drive.
July-Calendar Girls
They are also solid wood. They weren’t ugly. I had hoped that we could just leave them wood and paint only the trim around them. It was all taped up pretty tightly while we did the rest of the room. But, it needed to be done. So over the course of a few days, these got taped, primed, primed again, and then two coats of white. After I painted all 6 windows shut, Dustin got them opened and proceeded to paint them all shut again himself. Luckily, they are all free now, but what a pain! We were even careful!
But it’s not easy for a same sex domestic couple to raise a child – not when they spend most of their time firing guns and circumventing the law. And certainly not when crime boss Elias is lurking right around the corner! So click on the jump below and let’s put this review the f*** to sleep!
Just a moment ago--yet again--I heard another Jesus-sighting story. Our local radio station's morning show (that is on against my will since I share an office with two other people) dropped the story in that ever-so-slightly facetious tone only trained media personnel can achieve between another joke about wardrobe malfunction and the traffic report. It will never cease to annoy me how mainstream media will ignore stories of real apparitions and the grave messages that always come with them and then latch onto ridiculous claims of images of Our Lord or Our Lady appearing on things like grilled cheese sandwiches, cloud formations, superstore receipts, pet fur, on building walls...
I hope you all pop over to Pause, Dream, Enjoy - see what our DT came up with, and play along with us in this week's tag challenge. I hop you all have a great weekend! See you again soon :)
Behind the darkness came the twilight tired and thin and looking somehow exhausted. Being so much more delicate and having better sight the twilight could not understand how the darkness had fallen the way it had. Then as it had done, many many times before taking a deep breath the long suffering twilight stooped down to scoop up the darkness.
So there you have it, Ross still is a comedy genius, his new trendy audience however are far from it -- and are in danger of ruining his act for him.
1/2 c. semisweet chocolate chips
My cousin Jeanette made the darling cupcakes, my friend Jamie made all the stickers and cupcake toppers. She's amazing. See what she does here and here. I would recommend her for anything. She can design a house, make a craft, do some web design, dabble in card making, and pretty much everything else you could ever want in life. Love her. We borrowed the tule and drapery panels from a friend who had just thrown her grandkids a tea party. What a gem! I put together a plethora of other homemade goods, including cake pops for the first time which were not easy, despite what others said! Goods were baked, favors made, games played, love shared here there and everywhere in between.
Okay, if you can get past all those things, what do you do when you are slightly stupid, and you decide to do this at 6:30pm on a day that neither child had a nap? Well, then you start to deal with over tired, cranky, screaming children, that can’t sleep in the upright 1/4 seats they were given. Then you have to stop every 5 minutes because your child belts out at the top of his lungs a blood curdling scream because are you ready… you won’t take him to that green slide that he see’s somewhere in that imagination of his, because I looked, there was no green slide in Walmart. Must have been the slide that he went to earlier in the day. Or, because you won’t give him a pickle out of the jar of pickles, or because he can’t have this or that or this or that. You catch the drift.
God has been since the beginning of time. Jesus was with God. He was God. He is God. He never changes. God is the Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit.
3
The Souper
*Make sure to categorize and place some kind of organizer in the area, so that when you go through your mail, it has a home. You can use mail sorters, stackable trays, etc... whatever works for you. Go through EVERY peice of mail you have stacked... and purge whats not necessary to keep.
And it wasn’t as if I hadn’t been practicing–in my night dreams and in m daydreams–what to do with him. Goodness knows, I’d done enough in real life, my waking love life, to practice for this guy. And here he was. I just didn’t know what to do with him.
The SELF-PUBLISHING INDEX was first launched in June 2010.
With which I am afflicted;
2. The averaging method meant U.S. corn was included in the analysis. U.S. corn, mostly all of which is genetically modified, does produce mountains of product. Product that goes into ethanol and high fructose corn syrup, both of which are questionable uses of a pseudo-food (I use the word pseudo-food to describe GMO products.). It is an unfair comparison to suggest the loss of this entire product would even need to be replaced. Our world would be a better place without high fructose corn syrup in it. Our cattle would be better off eating grass. Our humans would be better off eating less cattle. So the conclusion that we would need to replace this system on a one to one basis, thus needing more land, is faulty.
According to web traffic site Alexa.com, the traffic of TR Emeritus has more than doubled in the last one week since it made headlines after news of being served a lawyer’s letter by PM Lee were splashed across the Singapore papers.
The first batch was the traditional walnut and almond with honey syrup. The honey, of course, came from our own little hive out back. In fact, I was chickening out of the challenge, and mentioned this to the gals in the hive. They retorted that if they could go through the effort of making honey, surely I could go through the effort of rolling out ridiculously thin pastry. Chagrined, I rose to the challenge.
We each have our own day to post here at Praiseworthy. And Friday is my day...but it's not just mine anymore!
I did my best stereotypical American male, grunting Tim Allen impersonation. “Oh, I’m not crying. (clear throat). No, Daddy was just thinking.” He looked at me with this great compassionate, fully resonant calmness, and said, “Daddy, this is about your friend who died, isn’t it? It’s okay to be sad. It’s okay to cry.”
4. Get familiar with penalties e.g watch bouts, practice verbal and hand signals - If it means doing the hand signals at work and saying it to passers-by...Do it with derby pride.
ASMP Meetings- the American Society of Media Photographers is generally geared toward established professional commercial photographers and photojournalists. Unlike PUGs and SMUGs, there is a fee to be a regular member of a local ASMP chapter (much like PPA), however it's minimal compared to other memberships and it generally includes perks and discounts that you wouldn't get otherwise. I included it on this list as a FREE resource because there are generally plenty of informal get-together events happening on a weekly or monthly basis where you can meet the group and find out if it's the right fit for you. Since many of these people are established professionals with strong opinions, tread lightly and figure out the personalities and politics before asking too many questions, but don't let that stop you from checking out whatever they have to offer for free. Find your closest chapter here:
I
I don't think there's a difference between good literature of the past and the present in terms of the voice and the compelling stories (language excepted). I do think that many of today's books try to satisfy the need for immediacy that our TV media brains demand. And I think that because we're used to the thirty minutes, everything-resolved-at-the-end kind of story, some books do just that. However, some don't, and I think those will be the "new" classics in the future. IMHO That's why I like to read Rostoff and Hinton and Cormier. They stir the pot, don't give you a lovely ending and leave you thinking.
They even send a leaflets to guide new Adworders to setup their account.
1. This was the mid point of the old Chihuahua Road or Ox-Cart Trail. It was the primary route between San Antonio and Goliad on the way to the Texas coast. At one time, Helena was the most important city on that route.
I sort of love their vintage quality, yet I love the look of a solid color statue.
Made up of extended family,
I sat down tonight and plugged a guesstimate of what I spent on my surgery into my tax program, and was pleasantly surprised at how this will help me out this year. Of course, I will run this past a tax consultant to ensure I'm not handling this news incorrectly, but at this point it seems pretty cut-and-dry. My program also seemed to suggest that medical related travel expenses could be written off as well.... Hmm.... Again, time to consult a tax professional.
Angle #3
“Barkeep, what about another double?”
“…You got a barge there or are you light?” “No, we’re light.”
The FEI will ensure that all findings produced by the working group are communicated on an ongoing basis.
Interviewer: Sheik Al-Qaradhawi, you described the Shiites as – and I quote – “heretics.” Then you call for Sunni-Shiite rapprochement. Do you want Sunnis to become close to “heretics,” as you call them?
Today I thought I'd show you a fun technique that creates a really show-stopping flower. The best part about it is that it uses a basic scalloped circle, which you can find on a whole bunch of different cartridges! I used Mini-Monograms, but you can use a scalloped circle or even a flower shape from anywhere.
Yes, "Phase II" orthodontia begins today, right before we head to school to pick up class lists, sign on to the PTO and put a few shekels in the hot lunch fund. Wish us luck on all accounts.
Coming back to Daylight Saving, what are the benefits? Does the one hour saved in the morning really compensate for the sleep loss and confusion? Come on, fess up, every season you wind up your clock, you make it late for that meeting at least once, yeah? Yeah. Anyways, I suddenly realized that I did have a lot to talk about. My parents went on a cool trip and I could link my mom’s blog. We moved house, and I could show you the photos. TS was part of a music video, and I could share the video. I came across a really cool artist, I could exhibit the paintings. Yep, lots to share.
Through every room downstairs, all empty. Something was very wrong.
One supplies the chance to bear, the other the soil.
It’s time we said No! to the “Defence State”.
My daughter, snuggled up next to me, points to Bruno. “I like that guy,” she says. “He’s funny.” Glad someone likes him.
I know I started my youthful fantasies, back when there was a Santa Claus, and an Easter Bunny and if you had a bad day, the next day was a promise with a kiss to be better. It was a world when moms and dads could tell you things and you believed them in your child-like innocence. Parents weren’t flawed people, they were just, well…parents. Apparently, life is not based out of old episodes of a television series. Reality hit me when I was an adolescent and those innocent years of childhood ended abruptly.
Silently, I stood staring at the face of the woman in the mirror as I desperately searched into her eyes for a shred of who she once was. The vacant look staring back at me frightened me to my core and I noticed that she was devoid of all emotion. She stood still and quiet as if to say "what more do you want of me".
- 784 words -
Its sounding flat
If you think it’s ok, then you lose your next election. If you think it’s wrong, then let’s talk about a plan like the balanced budget amendment.
However, there is some blockage of the uptake of one form of nitrogen for others (some plants like ammonia, others prefer nitrites). Also, the pH is an important moderator for the uptake of these nutrients into plants. The following discussion will note that the change of one form of nitrogen to another produces an acidic environment.
It's a half-heartedly warm, decidedly muggy Saturday in Brooklyn. The streets would be far more abuzz were it not for the shooting this past Wednesday, the tension from which is still palpable.
An interview with !The!Bang!Gang!!
"Yeah me too, NO WAY am I going up there."
His enemy is, of course, Loki, his brother. (Who turns out not to be his brother at all.)
Story: It's a decent story line. Ragnarok has already taken place. In order to save Asgard, the god sacrifed themselves and created Grim Angels to conquer the invading demons who came from Utgard. Asgard is saved, Utgard is remaned Riviera and is now the safe haven of the Sprites, and the gods left everything to a council of Sages. A thousand years later the Sages learn that demons are back and send two Grim Angels to activate the "Retribution" which will destroy both Riviera and the demons. That's where the game starts. Fairly early on there's a plot twist where the main protagonist is stripped of his memories and sent to live with the Sprites. This is where the actual game and story line kick in. I won't give anything else away, but the rest of the story steadily gets better.
President Obama flew to Florida this past week to explain high gas prices. According to the Washington Post, on his way to Florida this past Thursday, reporters were "perplexed" at the President's 41 minute flight from Washington, DC to Orlando, Florida taking 1 hour and 15 minutes. The flight was in the air an extra 30 minutes, burning precious fossil fuels.
Retro is cool these days, and films like Machete, Super 8 and God knows how many Quentin Tarantino films are having loads of fun harkening back to the pulpy, old school action films of the 70s and 80s. But what really takes talent is when a director comes along and delivers a slice of retrograde fun alongside some seriously introspective, in-depth stylistic filmmaking that has more in common with arthouse films. It’s kind of like dressing up Snake Plissken and sending him to a dinner with top-dollar corporate executives who eat caviar – it really shouldn’t work. But the fact is that Drive is a stellar movie with some memorable as hell scenes and some of the best directing and music of 2011.
So, there I was, a failure and not particularly heartbroken about it. Sure a degree in English Literature would do fuck all for me anyway. Would it get me published? No. It’d just get in my way. I needed to learn how to live life, then I could write, damn it.
Have you had better success with the new Blogger than me? Or are you equally frustrated? Anyhow, thanks for taking the time to read through this post.
It was so nice to spend another day free as me and not having any problems anywhere I went. My confidence is growing.
In Antwerp, the second-largest city in Belgium, an Islamic Sharia law court is now mediating family law disputes for Muslim immigrants. The self-appointed Muslim judges running the court are applying Islamic law — rather than the secular Belgian Family Law system — to resolve disputes involving questions of marriage and divorce, child custody and child support, as well as all inheritance-related matters.
“You sure like to keep your kitchen clean.” I said, more to myself than to her. But Betty answered anyway with a chuckle,
BLOCKBUSTER!
More than 3,500 farmers and smallholders have been brutally murdered under ANC-hegemony -- because of what Mokaba stood for with his chants of “Kill the Boer, Kill the Farmer”; his terrorist-activities in the Pietersburg region as a member of Umkhonte we Sizwe (the still active military branch of the African National Congress). Mokaba has never testified at the Truth and Reconciliation Commission – however former SADF officers did testify at the TRCe that Mokaba was suspected of many violent acts of terrorism causing the deaths of many people; that he was arrested for carrying out terrorist acts; but that three of his comrades had taken the rap and gone to jail instead when they refused to testify against him.
One of the frightening aspects of all this is that it doesn’t even seem to be creating much of a stir in the US, more occupied as it is with Whitney Houston, the Oscars and the ghastly, unreal comedy of the Republican presidential nomination campaign. It would offer some kind of hope if there were any real signals of some sort of public feelings of shame at the actions of its soldiers. But why should the Roman public be concerned about the doings of its legionaries in a remote country, mostly populated by religious fanatics; Pharisees, Sadducees and Zealots – or raghead Salafists, Shi’ites and Talibans? Particularly when there are more interesting bread and circus issues at home.
The beam from the flashlight caught every one of those shiny tin ornaments. The tree sparkled and shone. No one said anything. We all just stood, staring at our glistening tree. It looked to us like someone had gathered the night stars and scattered them on every bough. Dad had done that for us.
We LONG for Fall and our nature walks. Today, after staying home for a week and a half potty training Kian, I decided to chance it. Enough was enough. We must get out! So I threw together a lunch and out the door we walked.
Deryn Mentock I've dabbled in a lot of different mediums; stained glass, pottery, painting, sewing...lots of others. One thing I'd like to try that I've never even dabbled in is lampwork bead making. I love glass work and the colors in lampwork beads are gorgeous. The process, using the torch and glass rods, just looks like fun!
Here I used the February stamp from Knitting Daisy. The basket is filled with knittingcotton.
Me: *blush* thanks boo
Ms. Johnson was known for her over-the-top personality, designing clothes with bright neon colors and ending her runway shows by turning cartwheels.
I also got my Ahtanum Pale Ale into a keg that night. Great aroma, great taste. I love this recipe. Thanks JB at Austin Homebrew. I'm resting up a bit before I give this one a shake session today.
Louisiana and Mississippi (Shreveport east to Jackson, MS.. further east to Greenwood Springs, MS) …
Despite connoting camaraderie, such punches are still unsolicited. They are not discussed beforehand and are thus not consensual.
Suhartono was in court to seek jurisdiction leave on two occasions, from April 20 to 29, and from May 16 to June 6 to prepare for his marriage in Jakarta.
I was so excited to be able to go to the Cincinnati Blogger meet-up earlier this year and meet so many wonderful teachers! To be completely honest, I felt kind of like I was meeting celebrities when I met Abby (The Inspired Apple), Michelle (Fabulous in First) and Amanda (One Extra Degree) - these girls are just so amazing!
Anyway, the style / content and where it came from…
And you will KNOW him as Saviour of this chaotic world.
- salt and pepper
I'll rue the day I step
Hopefully, her multiple-role dreams go beyond the 30-second format.
To my dismay, this sentiment has not carried through for Easter. Our Family Egg Hunt has left us with an obscene amount of hard boiled eggs. I was hoping I’d have to throw a good portion of them away (exposure to the elements and all) but alas, this is not the case. I know, first thought is “No problem, eggs are versatile and a common ingredient…”
I walked the paths now little used
The fanfare is to welcome our new Strictly, Derek Thompson, who has manfully stepped into the shoes of our beloved Rod, who is off to poetical pastures new. We’ll miss Rod’s wit and wisdom hugely, but Derek will be bringing his own brand to the party, as a comedy writer (among other things) and occasional coach. So, on behalf of all Strictly followers, we decided to plonk the new boy down in the hot seat, direct a bright light into his eyes, and interrogate…er, that is, interview him:
I like to think that’s the writer in me.
I use these colored markers for the big guys, since they're too big to lay down:
Recently I posted my opinion of the Pac10 after viewing their conference meet on Fox Sports. Having had the opportunity to watch the Big12 championship this past weekend I want to add to my conference outlooks prior to the start of the regional meets this upcoming weekend.
I've saw this phrase on a bumper sticker "What Would Jesus Do?" It made me think, since it's a good question. What would Jesus do? Personally, I think very little. The choices were made long ago and things were set in motion. There is no mandate of faith or service. It's up to you and it's a choice of whether the anarchy of constant war is more important than the hope of constant peace.
Today’s Home Focus: Living Room Pick Up. Let’s recover the living room from the weekend’s fun. I know I can get going and having fun and just drop my dance class tote bag and pick up the camera and out the door again. So let’s spend a few minutes putting away any stray shoes, stuff from the weekend, the mail and any dirty dishes that are hanging around. Then we can fix ourselves a delicious meal, curl up with a book, a video or a craft project this evening. I love having a stash of books to read, videos to watch and craft materials at hand. But I find it hard to settle down and enjoy if my nest is cluttered.
They continued to play for a while, but the joy was gone. Eventually one said: ‘We will remain trapped here forever, if we cannot find our way out. Let us join forces and yet again seek to create a contradiction’
“Vertigo” opened up a new world to me – the world of Alfred Hitchcock. With a clever story, Hitchcock’s directing, and Bernard Herrmann’s haunting music, it captivated me. James Stewart turned my ideal “good guy” on his ear, presenting the image of a man flawed, obsessed, haunted by his past and trying to take control. The music in the film has stayed with me through the decades, down to last November when I first watched “The Artist,” and recognized the Scene d’Amour, used in the most climactic part of the film. That cemented my love for “The Artist,” as you can see in one of my earlier posts, A Lost Art.
So where does that leave me?
Dance Duel: Roshon & Chelsie and Jaleel and Kym
I have just been purging, having a garage sale, organizing,
You see, during the preceding week an offer to buy the restaurant was made and accepted within the space of three days bringing the curtain down on the six year tenure of Chef and owner Tim O’Brien. It also meant that I was out of both my restaurant manager role and my very successful gig as Beer Dinner host.
Happy Monday! According to my fancy google-analytics device, most of you read this blog during the week, most likely while you are at work! I hope I am able to give you a nice little respite from your return form the weekend. I know Mondays can suck, with their piled up voicemails and early wake up times (I just bought a sound deck to wake up to an actual song of my choice, I know I am behind the times on this and it's not new but it is to me!I am almost PSYCHED to wake up tomorrow! Ha!), but, as my dear friend David (aka Boston Guy, writer of THIS witty-commentary blog) once said "Mondays are days too, cause you can't go through life hating 1/7th of the week!" He even made me the wonderful sign (and posted it on my Freshman dorm door) pictured on your left (oddly sideways...).
"But what's that tint to her skin? Discoloration. It's kind of yellow. Like stain. And there's a strange odor in here."
Grated cheese for serving
The provincial government would assist the Bitou municipality and businessmen where possible to ensure "that there is no recurrence of what has been happening here”.
I managed to pick up a copy for dirt cheap. 199o’s western-ey, sciencey, steampunk-ey… but classic Bruce Campbell. If you like him and haven’t seen it, do so.
a silver moon with a bat which is part of the image.
1268 **D-III/29/1997. “Solomon, Son of David.” Law and American Culture Panels, Annual Convention, American Culture Association, San Antonio, Texas. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 653-65.)
Obscenity flaw flaps my jaw, spitting out these words of ponder and doubt
4) Onions, 2 pcs, cut into four
2. I have been divorced for almost 2 years and was married for 25 years. I am tickled pink to be by myself and love every minute of being independent.
That's what happened with the 2m of blue/grey wool mix I found in the bargain bin of my local fabric shop over a year ago. I've had lots of ideas of what to make with it but it was only when I saw Stephanie's blue knit wrap top that the penny actually dropped. There's a bit of a story here....at the end of last year, I sent one of my vintage patterns (Advance 7701) to Steph to copy, after she put out a plea for a 1950's wrap top pattern.
Walking back up the hill after the doctor’s office was extremely hard because of my various health issues –mostly centered on my weight.
What was I going to tell you? Oh yeah, I keep spotting deer on the edges of the fields around town and everyone thinks I've got some sort of magical "hunter's eye." Here's to it working when I get back to Cali for summer bow hunting.
the Jesuit faculty and was once class president. Nye served on the
But *deep breath* I will now be choosing some of those novels that I think you should be reading (and I'm afraid to say I grin madly every time I contemplate that fact!) I will be discussing with you the new directions we can see YA going. I can enthuse to you about how important and vital I think young adult fiction is.
Necklace: Dyrberg/Kern
Mix to combine. Serve as a side with fish.
and now your beautiful mommy is pregnant again......
I didn’t have the time at the moment to type anything out, but I spent some time thinking on the question. I find this to be a relevant issue and one where I have some passion, so I am posting it to share with the community at large.
Green beans***
Well actually many years ago I went to Moonee valley....and I have been to some country races....so technically it wasn't my first....but it was my first at Morphettville....and it was my first in a corporate box.
Karma, wouldn’t you agree that it’s a bi$%^? Despite the fact that many might say that it doesn’t exist, oh, it’s real my friends. Karma, it has no expiration date, it never forgets, it doesn’t accept apologies and it makes you pay sooner or later. I recall having a conversation with a few friends about karma and relationships. The debate had several good points, it went back and forward as we debated if karma really exist. Perhaps the phrase that most caught my attention was an opinion by a friend, “Karma is something someone bitter made up.”
Here is the flyer if you would like to pass it around to anyone who may be interested.
Today the orchids in my office; decided this is the day to show their purple power….so I took a pic with my phone and sent it to you. The universe is always sending us signs and this is one for sure….Traci among the Purple orchids seemed like a message that was encouraging, nurturing, and one full of gratitude. So I am sending you this with respect……blessings for all that you do.
Pour about two-thirds of the batter into the prepared pan and smooth top. Set aside 1/4 cup of the walnut-cinnamon mixture to use as a topping. Sprinkle the remaining mixture evenly over the batter. Insert a small knife about halfway into the batter and gently move it through the walnut-cinnamon filling to create a swirled effect. Pour the remaining batter evenly over the filling and smooth the top with the spatula. The batter will not cover the filling completely. Sprinkle evenly with the reserved topping.
And then the latest Pottery Barn magazine showed up, and it had their Moroccan Pendant, and I was sold! They had just sent me a 15% off coupon for PBKids, so I called and asked if they'd apply to to a PB order. The lady said no, but that she could give me 10% off, and they were running a free shipping promo too...score! Love it when everything works out like that!
In a large salad bowl, layer the lettuces, cabbage, avocado, fennel and beets.
On her wedding day
Crash
I hope that the above information does clarify some questions about these brand new templates.
Cities can be reached by superhighways and space age bridges but neighborhood streets aren't being repaired.
Blondie Rapture UK
Which, of course, it was. At least someone else had their money, which was why they hadn’t any.
I opened the door and the first thing I saw was a small puddle of pink syrup on the floor. Laying next to the puddle was an empty bottle of Benadryl. I looked at Jackson and noticed pink syrup dripping from his lip and running down his shirt. I asked him if he drank the Benadryl and he said that he did. When I asked how much did he drink he said "A lot." I did not know how much medicine was in the bottle to begin with so I went into a bit of a panic. More of a panic then the time when a three-year-old Wyatt drank almost a full beer. Panics at 6:30 in the morning move a lot slower than afternoon panics.
1) Kids require you to do things you don’t want to do (e.g. clean up excrement, negotiate over petty things like how many spoonfuls of vegetables to eat, forego sleep)
Who will hire these oldsters, many of whom suffer from various age-related infirmities? Why hire an old person when you can hire a twenty-something with much more energy and stamina? The link in the paragraph before this one notes that the unemployed older people are most likely to be unemployed longer.
For this part I go and get a bucket, I may vomit, I was thinking about videoing this post but I don't think you lot want to see me chunder!
2. The last CD you bought was...
It is as much an anti-people government as any other. The series of evictions of hawkers and slum dwellers, and steps like abrupt stoppage of subsidies to public sector transport corporations resulting in non-payment of salaries to hundreds of employees have already made this clear as daylight. Naturally it is also anti-democratic, as evidenced by, inter alia, moves to make elected panchayat bodies more subservient to administrative officials.
At the end of the day (you're another day older) (and that's all you can say for the life of the poor) (it's a struggle--) can't it be all of those things? Or, just that maybe, maybe, we all have cities. Places that for us are exotic and comforting all the same. Maybe for you it is New York, or for my best friend it is Paris. My sister, she would say San Diego. My young cousins would say Siena.
Mom - Waaa? How can you forget? Your birthday is also My Mother's Day! I carried you for 9 difficult months, went through 24 hours of the worst labor pains that I can still remember clearly 40 years later, all with no pain relief. This is more my day than yours!
Thanks for joining us today! We hope you'll join us again tomorrow for more!!!
Just think. My brother will be 67 when Koll Henry turns 19. And my Jesse will be 38. Probably they'll all be out there on Thanksgiving Day, playing their annual game of football. I like that thought.
If anyone knows how to get rid of that, they should leave a comment detailing the proper procedures… because I got nothing aside from Gordo.
Anne Amundsen / Lost: a Literary Treasure, Last Seen in Tonga / 217
The theme of this years program is “ Bereavement Strikes Twice.” The ceremony starts at 7:15 pm. It will include readings, a speaker, and a choir made up of singers from Agudas Achim, Beth Shalom, Beth Tikvah, Temple Israel, and Koleinu, the Jewish Community Choir.
The latest twist is the sudden resignation of George Nicholas as Chairman of Caribbean Airlines and the opaque statement by the Minister of Transport, Devant Maharaj – “…Yes. I can confirm this. I am in receipt of his letter but I cannot say anything more…”
ALEC’s major service to members is its development of model legislation, which can then be adapted to the needs of each state.
What a revelation! As the delicate flavours exploded (you wouldn’t think that “delicate” flavours could “explode” but I’m telling you, THEY DID) across my palate, I realized I was hooked. One humble oyster changed my world.
And be humbled in Iceland
To make pressure point self defense easy to learn and easy to teach.
Cytomic have announced another VST called: "The Drop", an analog-modelled resonant filter plug-in. It's still in development with release expected before the end of the year. Several audio demos are available.
On August 5, 2011, I finally found a copy of Tome I, and now I can settle down with the whole thing and enjoy.
I'm alright Jack,
outside
Look, I’m not averse to those types of movies; in fact, some of them I much like, but it’s so refreshing when a movie like Our Idiot Brother comes around that it’s warmth and earnestness kind of washes away just how problematic some of the film is. There could have been a lot more here, but that would have required the filmmakers to extend the film’s running time, and I think of one of the film’s great strengths is its ability to drop us right into this family and allow us to bask in how everything just seems normal and comfortable for this family and then to know when to call it quits; it’s so rare for a comedy to clock in under two hours these days that any comedy that is short almost scores immediate points in my book. But there’s more to the film than that. All of the archetypes are here for Peretz and company to revel in their quirkiness a la Wes Anderson or the coldly mock their idiosyncrasies a la Noah Baumbach or to paint the portion of New York that the film takes place in an unflattering way so that we laugh at how silly these hippies and tight-asses are instead of understanding where they come from. Now, that last part makes it sound like Our Idiot Brother is up to a lot more than it really it and even though it may not be that type of movie, it’s one of the best movies to be released under the usually off putting title of “Sundance Movie.”
The book was inspired by the film Mama Mia, and the fact that everyone kept talking about how ABBA would never come together again, and I, for one, being a consummate optimist, with a proclivity to not listen to what others tell me, especially when it includes the word “NO” - so, yes, I think that ABBA can put on a performance that can shake the world and mark musical history, even to this day.
Nas - 38
Jude was finally able to come home today after exactly 4 weeks in the NICU. Thanks for your prayers!
Other Stuff:
The sun was golden in its rising — like a handsome, brave prince-knight dashing into the day of battle. Glorious in his victory over the darkness, the sun invites a celebration of spring. I inhaled the sweet air of morning. There is always one spring morning in May when the air is balmy.
a nice snazzy little heel
Indian saying
Unlike the Titanic , Gibb’s steel and bolts were his soul, spirit ane will to live that helped him battle and have brought him through incredible odds that threatened to take his life much like the fated ship that ended over 1,500 passenger’s and crew’s lives on April 15, 1912.
Where are you from?
His motivation in applying for the position was obvious. His wife already had relocated to a new job in our area, and he was still working hundreds of miles away.
How do you want to be mentally? How would you like your brain to perform? Your memory?
I felt my "Tumbling E" eye chart would look lonely and kinda sad by itself- so I whipped up another eye chart. This time it was Restoration Hardware's more traditional "Letters" chart.
I was young, full of energy, always off exploring… no one ever went near the Forest, I had never known why. One day I ventured too close, and a voice called out to me.
Upon my return to the UK, I had a happy discovery! I have been hired for a job that begins on November 1st. I am so happy to return to work after such a long sabbatical! Wish me luck!
It's exploitative rubbish really, people hoping that you'll come for the half-naked heroines but stay for their crappy horror story. Well, you've already paid by that point. As soon as its heroines get dressed, all colour drains out of the film. Nothing to see here, move on. And Soon the Darkness. Indeed, I turned the TV off.
1 attains
experience really feels like for customers today. Why? Communications or
Gallery at Gary Allan High School (3250 New Street, Burlington) open in evenings until 8 p.m. _______________________________________________________
In case of failure of submission the resulting behavior depends on the error.In most cases the best practice is to show the review page again with the appropriate message. This message can be to retry the submit again (e.g. in case of timeout) or make necessary changes before submitting again. This step could be very annoying so make sure that customers know exactly what went wrong and what are the steps to take. In case user wishes to cancel the wizard there should be a link to do so. I am always shocked to see so many sites losing their customers at the final step by not properly informing them.
I'm feeling positive.
Dave and I have an apartment in the San Diego area that we have rented out weekly for nearly six years. For the past four years he has handled every renter and every issue we have had from here. When he gets a lead via email, he responds immediately. If someone wants to speak to him, he calls them the first chance he gets. There have only been a handful of weeks that don't get rented, and now I'm convinced that it is for one reason: he responds to people.
Tomorrow....Indie Bands I can stand.
Guinsoo: You know the forums aren’t going to buy that.
Fun , right??? Plus, the amazingly talented Savannah is staying on the team, and will serve as coordinator. She and Kim have truly outdone themselves with this new re-structuring. I'm so excited to see what awesome projects come out of this! I mean, just look at these cute new graphics!
I have been blessed with great kiddo's and grandkiddo's :O)
Fareda: I’m telling you this because our next adventure is to go to the flea market.
Hello, everybody!
But,…what we DO,with our new found freedom,…is up to US.
Candace
So I ask you.
Nest abilities cut with Cuttlebug
The Suns Going to Shine For Me Soon
Have a happy Monday!
There’s really a dirth of recipes for single folks who like to cook. I can’t eat a whole pan of lasagna by myself. Even soup makes 6 servings, and let’s be honest, I get tired of it after 3 meals. I know, I know, “Freeze the leftovers!” they say. So I do, and then 6 months later I throw away the frozen tupperware of mysterious, icicle-covered contents.
Since my last post, something like 29 days have passed. You maybe didn’t miss me, but I’ve missed this. Here’s what I’ve been doing. These are not excuses although they sound like good ones.
and the life everlasting. Amen.
Rare pick: Angel of glory rise(W), Cathar’s cruisade(W), Riders of gavony(W), Gallows at willow hill(A),
For example, I know I get good light late morning from my South-facing windows. So I when we made cookies together, I had us do it late-morning around our table, scooted close to the window.
Tomorrow is dedicated to my dogs! I'm moving Saved to the weekend cuz I gots plans! Hope everybody had a great weekend.
I extend my hand across
Last week it really hit me. Many ways really. After the meeting with my friend, there was an opportunity to make some food (again) for the football team.
So, while admitting it's not for everyone, I've been reading enough of it with enough intensity, I should take the time to share what I've learned for those interest. And I know not everyone will be interested.
The idea that we learn and grow from our experiences is an a principle that will never change!
- Write subject position you want to apply on your CV
From the moment that Ferne went to the emergency room, dozens of friends came down to hold vigil in the waiting room. Dr. Henry Kaldenbaugh was on duty and came out crying to tell them that Ferne was in a coma.
7. Did the challenges inherent in publishing Bibles contribute to developing a small book with lightweight pages that stays open? Have any dwarsligger Bibles been printed yet, or is there an upper page count that limits such an application?
Eluned Parrott AM for South Wales Central and Councillor Nigel Howells popped in to discuss the future of The Vulcan with the landlady and campaign members.
Keating time. I once heard Robin Williams say that he based his performance on what his dream teacher would be, but whom he never had. Considering how much coke Williams did and his decision to make Bicentennial Man, I am not sure this is a good thing.
(probably originally had an accent mark over the "don," but that's been lost sometime over the last 500 years in the New World).
CCC GDT SPOT
and angels sing.
I see my peers doing so much and yes we all have that little voice that sometimes says, “look at you, you ain’t shit and you haven’t accomplished anything with your life.” But that voice will be no more for me. I will no longer look at them and become depressed because I am not where I want to be but instead let it motivate me to work harder.
I became scared of you
About TriCounty Community Network
Submission. Obedience. Death.
7- Iron Wonder Under onto the wrong side of your fabric scraps.
Source: advanced reading copy from my amazing sales rep, Nicole Dufort
And if I disappear
I am reaching for something more than squiggles on pages. I’m telling them “Look, do a couple of questions, if they’re easy and you understand them then skip to the harder stuff. If you’ve got this concept nailed, go back to those concepts you don’t understand and brush up on those.”.
Surely, we can change. Surely, we must.
Neither of us would begin to pretend to be perfect or that ours is a model marriage. That innate trust, however, allows us to do our own thing while actually reinforcing our husband and wife relationship.
At the moment Mum has finished four panels and she's working on the fifth (at the bottom of the picture, you can see the strip of binding that still needs attaching).
Attributes: Agility-d4, Smarts-d10, Spirit-d12, Strength-d10, Vigor-d8
As with the last round, this one starts with Brauerei Spezial Bamberg but this time their Märzen. This pours a clear rich amber with a thin tan head. The aroma is somewhat fruity, in a fresh appealing way. Like fresh cooking apples. A bit like the Lagerbier, this has a restrained smokiness. It lingers on the tongue after the sweet caramel-like malts wash down. There's a slight bitterness that is spicey in nature, with an almost gingery warmth. Apples come out again in the finish. I hate to describe it like this, but I can't help thinking apple pie with a salty shortbread crust. Interesting. Unfortunately, after a while it gets a bit sticky-sweet and, for me at least, it wasn't really as enjoyable as their Lagerbier.
By shadows.
But just as sure as the hand of God, they brought death to my hometown
Most of what's on the BRAT diet is not on the Teagan Diet. Banana? No way. Rice? Maybe if you drown it in ponzu sauce or if it's fried rice from the hibachi place. Applesauce? Meh, no thanks. Toast- only if she can have butter and cinnamon sugar on it.
Each remaining egg is then picked up and with a soft sponge (dollar store sponges work great) I gently scrub off any dirt. You’ll soon discover that a light touch is all you need.
So we carry on as best we can, don't we? I'm sure you each have a concern or two of your own that's pressing on you like an anvil. So what do we do to keep moving forward?
...Five reasons why you should totally read this book!
Much as I approve of a mayor playing the pander, I can’t think of a species less suitable for group pair-bonding exercises than homo sapiens. Everyone knows that humans vary enormously in their attractiveness to the opposite sex, often for utterly trivial reasons such as the shape of the chin or the size of the nose. If you put single humans together in groups, the ugly ones get shunned because they’re ugly and the beautiful ones get shunned because no one will risk getting rejected by them.
While I am disappointed in myself for this (rare, I hope) misfire, I must say I was not impressed with the level of discourse in the comments (with few exceptions), which is why I just deleted all of them. There are many occasions when I come upon a blog that I think needs its mouth washed out with soap and I don't plan to make this blog one of them. I was especially disappointed in the comments of Anonymous, who usually has more interesting things to say and uses much less colorful and repetitive language. I can't believe that I need to say this, but as disappointing as my piece may have been, death threats were not an appropriate response. In fact, death threats are never an appropriate response to anything. Do they not teach this in schools?
Butter for greasing
So I tried to read up on stuff, heard from a few friends, and seemed to find out that there really wasn't anything I could do about it, but I can make some changes-eating differently--which is going to be a challenge, not because I crave certain foods or am hooked on bad ones, just figuring out what is the better choice--and exercise-and hopefully be able to manage it and be just fine and Little Bit will be just fine.
The child care purchase is an extremely emotionally-driven decision. For years, I have professed that parents base their decision to enroll in one program over another based more on how they feel than on all the information they find and you give them. When the development and happiness of their child is concerned, parents are fervent in their efforts to make the right choice. More than with most other purchases, they research, they visit several centers, they read reviews and talk to other opinion influencers, and they need to feel assured they are making the best decision for their child and their family.
The sun’s heat is all over the place for the past few weeks. The hottest days in history. Scorching and skin-burning exposure. Not too mention throat-drying and strength exhausting walks. Almost everyone I know desired for rain to come to escape such heat, and to our great joy the rain poured today.
“What do we have to show for 3 and 1/2 years of President Obama? Is it easier to make ends meet? Is it easier to sell your home or buy a new one? Have you saved what you need for retirement?”
Now, in case you think I’m becoming a beer snob (maybe the bulk of the population are just beer slobs??) I’m not, I’m just using these pages to lament the fact that award winning craft beers and imported offerings are never given the sort of full page spread that items, like this, of dubious merit or educational worth seem to get regularly. If you want to make up a full page ad for a big brewer, just say so.
I suppose the romance among the young cast is still up in the air, but I’m still firmly rooting for WooMin and Soo Hyun & Jinhaeng in the end. While WooMin was my reason for investing viewing hours, the writers have also been unselfish about building up both pairings (even a Siwan & Kyung Pyo combo, LOL), and it’d be hard to ignore all those scenes. I’ve grown fond of Soo Hyun and Jin Haeng, and I’ve been anticipating Jin Haeng’s about face from apathy to reciprocating Soo Hyun’s feelings. There’s a challenge to that process that, as a viewer, I’m looking forward to experiencing with Jinhaeng and Soo Hyun.
was on leave of absence as the
We get ideas for each meal for the weekend and for their lunches, because guess what?! If they suggest it, they will eat it!!!
Slipcovers have come a long way since those horrible plastic or vinyl covers of the 1950s and 1960s. Now you can get them in a variety of colors, as well as fabrics.
Okay. I decided to make this as direct as possible.
6. Here is the part that you may love the best. You can use a cover that you have already done for Covered. You can only submit one design though. Make it count!
It only takes one bite...
I spent seven years having a go at revolutionizing the novel. At the end of it I had no money, no publisher, and was homeless. But I had some bloody good art, and that has to be enough for you because it may well be all you will get.
So I’m asking us to downgrade our reactions to channels from the crusader stance of “Down with the Infidels!” to a simple preference, a leaning away from or towards. The final verdict is whether we’ll read them or not on a continuing basis, rather than on whether we’ll hang them from the highest tree.
NOTE2: if you do not renew DHCP Lease you may loose network connectivity.
How can we send policy makers out into the world without ensuring that they have a full understanding of how urban policy has impacted urban communities of color? How can we do this and claim to be a social justice institution? The Obama Administration was supposed to shine a new light on urban policy in America, but the President’s urban policy efforts seem to be going nowhere fast. As a heterodox and social justice-oriented institution and program, we should not be constrained by what’s hot right now. Of course there is the reality of offering programs and courses based on demand. I’m not challenging that, but what I am saying is that Milano should not just be driven by consumer demand, it should encourage students to engage issues that are overlooked in the popular policy discourse. Milano needs to have a greater emphasis on race, class, and what’s going on in communities of color across the city.
Fact; I wanna get a hair cut, and highlights. xD
So, I've been very, very inactive. Sorry.
I’ll be on the road, so any nuggets will have to wait until next week. But I’ve found that Richard Adam’s Guardian liveblog is highly entertaining. You should be able to find it on this page. Or you can go with Sully.
His name is Norbert O’Ryan and he looks like a 19th Century Irish sea captain.
William Otto Caspar, 57, Eatontown, N.J.
I think I will forgive her
“It teaches children to be violent and that hitting people is okay and hilarious.”
-Sleeps 3-4 hours at a time at night
Day 6
The Secret of Shadow Ranch---Dave Gregory was the cowboy who captured Nancy's heart in this one. It's a little worn on the corners, but really, for as many times as I read this one, it's in remarkably good condition.
But I found myself becoming uneasy. For one thing, my model in ministry is a guy who spent the majority of his ministry time with twelve men. A guy who, when he left this earth, had only about 120 people who were actually sticking around and doing what he told them to do. More like a minichurch, really. Jesus Christ – the youngest minichurch pastor in history.
Robert De Niro has made many, many iconic films in his time that will live on for generations. The films span time periods, decades and cultures. The list is long and distinguished and for good reason, he made brilliant films with brilliant performances and chose brilliant scripts. Any film maker could make a masterpiece with De Niro in his prime. One film maker took full advantage of his opportunity to do so.
Proverbs 24:19-20 is the takeaway today. “Do not fret because of evildoers or be envious of the wicked; for there will be no future for the evil man; The lamp of the wicked will be put out.”
I like to think about the days since, so I appreciate all he did in that time.
So I wonder if you can guess which picture I chose for the biography page of my author's new book? Katherine says I should put it here, but I can’t because of copyright, so you’ll have to wait until February when "Sword of Light" is published to find out!
it was for me really great experience, conducting one of the greatest polish composers Witold Lutoslawski in Thailand, in Bangkok with Thailand Philharmonic Orchestra (TPO).
Day 18: Have you found something that puts you at peace?
‘So like I was saying, my dear. They trying to say is Horace what provoke the man and Horace tell me that if the man didn’t dead he is the one who woulda been bringing charges. Is defend the boy was defending he own self, and from since he small is I who teach him to not let people take advantage. You remember when they was boys and Ducky did try and take he new sneakers? The beating I hear he put on that broko-foot boy, and everybody thought was a fool I had. Don’t laugh. You see how he two wrist bandage? Poor thing, eh? Well is brakes he was brakesing the knife and lucky he manage to get the gun, otherwise I mighta have to bury the one son god give me. You could imagine burying yours? Mother not suppose to see they child go in the ground before them. I feel grief in my heart for the other lady, but if wasn’t she it woulda be me. I don’t care where they say the gun come from, is not better for him that he had it? The lord works in wondrous ways.’
The Hanns.G monitor has a product dimension of 29.3 x 10.9 x 23.5 all around. It is considered a good buy since it is also a 28″ monitor which definitely proves it is worth every penny.
To be sure, some online programs have potential and are necessary in areas where traditional resources aren’t available. For instance, online AP classes serve rural communities without access to qualified teachers, and there are promising efforts to create programs that adapt to the needs of students with special learning requirements. But by and large, there is no evidence that these technological innovations merit the public resources flowing their way. Indeed, many such programs appear to be failing the students they serve.
I dealt with why this was a bad pragmatic plan last time. Let’s talk about the principled reasons why this is dumb. “Fair.” Let’s make the tax code fair. Children, whiny, spoiled children whine about “fair”—adults talk about justice. What is justice? Well the simplest definition would be that everyone gets what they deserve. So is the tax code just? Nope. There are far too many loopholes and deductions where the government quite unjustly tries to pick winners and losers, and the taxes are too high. It’s a double injustice. Now if you wanted to talk about justice instead of fairness you would get rid of the loopholes and lower the rates (although true justice would require that everyone pays at least something as everyone benefits from government protections of a military, police and court system). Raising the rate on people because they’ve done well isn’t just, it’s punishing success (but liberals don’t believe money is made through skill and drive but because of corruption in despite of all knowledge of human nature and history). But if you really wanted justice and not just a whine of fair you would support the Ryan Plan. Hell, since, as Ryan has put out numerous times, it’s up the Ways and Means Committee to decide the future of loopholes…how about eliminating all deductions after $200,000…and reduce them for income after $100,000. Republicans would support that. Because it’s just or at least more just than what we have now. But raising rates isn’t just…it’s not even fair as you’re talking about raising rates on capital gains (money that derives from income which has already been taxed, and then invested in companies which also pay corporate taxes, so yes let’s tax it a third time…and if you buy anything with it we’ll slap some sales tax on that too…oh yeah that’s fair). But please continue whining about fair.
"He was in here! Oh my God! David Tirlson! Rachel is going to totally die when I tell her. Oh my God! Is he still in here! Oh my God!"
Those are actually level 125 equipment! They level up like reverse items. The thing that’s probably most interesting there is the last one at the really bottom-right. That’s the White Angelic Bless ring. It adds 10 on every stat and casts a 12 attack buff! I still didn’t see anyone wearing it and I don’t know where to get the recipe.
Grameen Foundation has been selected as a semi-finalist for the Ashoka Changemakers Powering Economic Opportunity: Create a World that Works competition, for our initiative to provide mobile phone-based services and business opportunities for the poorest in Indonesia. We were selected as one of 15 semi-finalists from 873 innovations in 83 countries around the world!
I will have the same resolve with whatever it turns out to be as I have about anything else these days, because as all the shitty toxins of junk food and pre-packaged garbage have been leaving me I have to tell you one thing that is unquestionable. My mind has never felt more clear. I was drinking Iced Tea all day. That's gone now. I was drinking artificial sweetener in my coffee every morning. Gone. Just black now. I sometimes don't bother with a second cup.
Interestingly, during the meeting the auditors were so bubbly they laughed at every single joke I cracked. Then one of them discreetly told me, “if you want, you can come to our office and look at the documents.” I knowingly smiled. I know what she meant. It happened before. It was an invitation to talk to them. They’d probably tell me they did not mean to give us a headache. They probably just wanted to get back at that one person who’s making their lives miserable. Nonetheless, they gave us tips on how to reconcile stuff. So I guess my hunch was right for proposing to hold that meeting. One less headache for my boss.
This display of bitter media disappointment. followed weeks during which such seemingly disparate groups as trade unions, national newspapers and the Anglican church had all come together to condemn a single political party and appeal to the public not to vote for them.
Perhaps that is why Frank wanted the largest ICE detention center built on Sheridan Street. Could have been the thousands of dollars that ICE and their lobbyist donated to his election account?
7:00 - Linda Barnes
Malema’s spokesperson Floyd Shivambu previously told City Press he would not respond to “futile fishing expeditions” by the newspaper.
Oh yeah. In case you were wondering. I'm home. Back in the cold as frozen shit South Africa. In home sweet Africa with Elvis at the security gate telling me he's missed me, Mrs. Guru, these two months, and peeps calling me Sir.
Under Clinton, the entire federal government put massive pressure on banks to grant more mortgages to the poor and minorities. Clinton’s secretary of Housing and Urban Development, ANDREW CUOMO, investigated Fannie Mae for racial discrimination and proposed that 50 percent of Fannie Mae’s and Freddie Mac’s portfolio be made up of loans to low-to moderate-income borrowers by the year 2001.
Thankfully, the show was almost over and I thought that was the end of that. Until she asked for it again. And again. And then the next night, and the next night. "I don't WANT Dora, I want the BUG SHOOOOW!"
This was when Howard got home. Always the voice of reason and wisdom, Howard gently reminded me that this was in fact what we were called to do in this season and that I needed to remain firmly planted in His word. Always my reminder that attitude is everything he held his half full glass of water up and gave me the look. :) (sometimes it is superbly annoying how right he is and how great his perspective generally is. I may have wanted to knock the glass out of his hand.)
Alternate: Matt Damon, Invictus
Smoking Popes – Diary Of A Teen Tragedy (Asian Man Records)
Brown or black versus the Board of Education is no longer the white person's problem.
Over yonder, where the shopping centre car park is now, there was a field of Friesian cows, gently a-mooing and chewing their cuds. Behind would be Barton Power Station, a miniature edition of Battersea. I miss that almost as much as the annual air show, three days of random aerospace history to-ing and fro-ing to the aerodrome for the Sunday event. Gypsy moths and a Vulcan bomber were a given. Sometimes there'd be the thrill of a Hurricane or Lockheed Lightning and, just that once, a Spitfire and a Lancaster. Sunday tea time would see everyone standing in their front gardens to watch the Red Arrows and then it was officially over.
To those who note that there is probably some political bias in this post - it says as much about the over-the-top lavishness of the system as it does about the individuals. When even the most objective person witnessess these specatcles, the doorman's (no doubt a Clinton/Obama supporter) perjorative comments first come to mind - followed by countless questions - starting with - how did we get in so deep on the concept of imperialism in a government of the people, by the people and for the people? - or - couldn't they have somehow squeezed by with only 5 vehicles and 20 men? - or - is there anyone connected with these trips who is even thinking about a budget? - or - does the President ever look around and tell his minions - "guys - we really do need to cut the spending on this stuff!!!"
BF: The story they tell me is, “Look. We’re destroying the environment. There’s too many people for the planet to support.”
Thursday.
How is that in touch with reality? She didn’t intend it to be unconventional? Six in vitro pregnancies? Agreeing to have at least six embryos implanted in her obviously fertile uterus that had already produced twins? How is that anything but intentional? It’s pure delusion.
She immediately pointed to her girl — 80 pounds, naked, pale and strung up with her arms above her head “like a piece of meat.”
No more excuses!
Pear Cranberry Ginger
What transforms us is the internal life of Christ within us all.* This is a together thing. His image is corporate. So, doesn’t it make sense that the process of conforming us to that image would also be corporate?
And sometimes I can see
So from my perspective I would like to share some things about learning that help make it stick. I have our clients in mind, since we want to help them get the most of the hard work they have put in.
Over the past four years, the State of the Nation: K-12 Online Learning in Canada study has attempted to address this gap by examining of the regulation and activity of K-12 distance education in Canada. In this ongoing series, Dr. Barbour returns to CIDER with this year’s State of the Nation.
Life near the Piney Woods of east Texas can be full of discoveries and every Fall a strange ritual takes place. Homecoming ! For foreigners or people new to the area it is a puzzling sight. What the heck are those silk mums with ribbons and streamers hanging down doing in the floral department of the local grocery stores? Little did we know then that this was just the beginning of a long quest for many mothers, especially those who have boys, and like me are completely clueless about what to do with the darn things.
Everything to God in prayer.
That being said I did enjoy the concept. A very powerful Witch solves a crime and falls in love with a Vampire. The sex scenes bordered on erotic and while they were satisfying *pun intended, lol* a little more heart from the characters would have driven home their point *pun not intended, if you see the pun that is…* I think a good sex scene needs not just physical tension but emotional tension as well. Nelson’s characters were a little rough to fulfill the latter element.
Notes: There will be a 10 Burpee penalty for every missed rep.
For the ganache filling, place chocolate and cream in a small microwave-safe bowl. Cook on high power until mixture is warm to the touch, 20-30 seconds. Whisk until smooth, and transfer to the refrigerator. Let stand until just chilled, no longer than 30 minutes.
Angel Fire is the second book in L.A. Weatherly’s Angel trilogy and the first book Angel was one of my favourite YA reads of 2010 so I’ve been desperate to get my hands on this one for a long time now. The angels in this series are like none you will have come across before, not your usual benign beings in this series they are deadly. The first book was full of action and I loved the romance between Willow and Alex, I’m very excited to see where the twists and turns will take us in this instalment.
First I wanted to share another main kit only layout from 35mm:
You will be familiar with much of the seafood that is available, but some may be new to you as well. Some of the selection includes: Arctic char, barramundi, catfish, cod, croaker, dogfish, flounder, grouper, hake, herring, mackerel, opah, perch, pollock, rainbow trout, sablefish, salmon, sardines, tilapia, tuna, turbot, and more. Which of those fish are new to you? I was happy to see all of the small fish which were highlighted, from anchovy to smelts, as they are usually a very sustainable choice. You'll find plenty of shellfish, including lobster, crab, scallops, conch, oysters and more. You'll even find more exotic fare such as alligator, caviar, frog legs, and eel. I do like alligator. There isn't much that lives in the sea which cannot be found here.
Though advised not to take the drinks onto the open beach, and to stay within the roped area - the venue was thoughtful enough to provide some seating for those of us who were just looking for a place to kick back until our table was ready for dinner. We dutifully found the yellow umbrellas denoting the designated area - and was happy to see that the tables were still on the sand, though further back and closer to the parking lot - and plopped down to enjoy our drinks and peruse the menu.
“Which begs the question who would want to kill Mitch?” Just then Jeremy’s phone ranged. “Hello. Really? Interesting. That’s going to help a lot thanks!”
Since I couldn't find a chalkboard eraser at the office supply store by my work, I picked up this microfiber cloth in the $1 bin there thinking it'd probably work. And I'm pleased to say that it did and it was cheaper than the $3 chalkboard eraser they were out of stock. It doesn't have any washing instructions but I'll probably throw it in the washing machine at some point.
Now then, grab a donut! It's time for everybody's favorite Wednesday feature, Would You Read It!
People around you also: the people around you also can also help you in discovering your purpose, because what you enjoy doing most for people and they appreciate you the more can be a clue to you knowing your purpose.
It’s such a shame that we have lost formula 1 motorsport in this country to the rich sports package owners only.
6. I made copies of everything, three-hole punched it, and put it in my "Tax" binder.
Time table
What is interesting about Samaw’el is that he lived contemporary with the great Jewish philosopher, Maimonides, though they probably never met. And while Samaw’el wrote his Ifham al-Yahûd in 1163, rewritten in 1167, Maimonides wrote his Iggeret Teyman (Letter to Yemen) in 1172, where he deals with some of the points in Samaw’el’s Ifham. It is possible that Maimonides had read the Ifham, but his answer to the Yemenites was not based on this, but rather on another Jewish convert, who used Samaw’el’s arguments against the Yemenite Jewish community. It is not weird that later Muslims, especially Jewish converts, took use of the Ifham, but this happened relatively early after it was written, hinting at some early popularity (as far as it wasn’t just a coincidence, but many of the points being raised seems to similar for it to be a coincidence).
Then Shirley had to get into the game. She, too, came over to see what was going on. I felt her spring lightly onto my hip. Laverne gallumps, Shirley jetes. She confirmed that it was indeed moi, and not SH, her favorite. She left. I'm not the one she wants.
DINOSAUR!!!!!!!!!!
I am a vegetarian. I never really liked eating meat in the first place – I have always found it rather suspect and vaguely disgusting – but after a rather disconcerting experience (a work assignment including visits to abbatoirs – I found out too late and couldn´t refuse) I would no longer put up with it and announced I was a vegetarian. The advantage being I can now tell people I can´t eat meat, because I am a vegetarian and they don´t get offended, which they would if I said I´rather starve than eat that.
1 small white onion, halved and finely sliced
I wonder!
What's your favorite thing to wear all day and night?
Whether we win a MAD is yet to be decided; I know that there are lots of outstanding blogs out there who, just like me, write for the enjoyment of it and are very worthy of an award.
Pinball Wizard
If you're interested in two, leave two comments, etc.
Here is my story that will recount to all of you that toddlers still have lots of needs too...
So true. But the thing is, we can’t really recognize the script as bullshit until we’re actually old enough to know better. Which means that, even when we’re younger–at our alleged ‘prime’–we’re being made to feel less powerful, because somewhere in the back of our minds, we believe that our expiration date is approaching. And, to quote, well, myself, when it comes to our choices, everything becomes that much more stressful, that much more loaded, when played out against the backdrop of a ticking clock. As women, the message we’re fed is clear: Time is short, so you better choose wisely! You’re only going to be relevant for so long! And what’s most unfair about that message is that, by and large, we aren’t aware of the bullshit quotient until later. How could we be?
*large clothespins
One must understand that in those days the Boers main objectives were not to catch the savages and recover their stolen ox, wagons, and other possessions. No, --- they wanted to wipe the bastards off planet earth; --- a feat they never accomplished, simply because .....
Melt the chocolate in a double boiler broke in pieces, and once melted add the butter completely. Allow to cool but not completely. With this mixture fill the "strain" leaving visible parts of rolls with a filling.
“It’s OK, sweetheart. I’ll take her with me so you don’t have to watch her.”
sooooo hot!! it was 90 degrees and his parents a/c wasn't working. bleh.
I live with myself because I tell myself that I don't contribute to most of the problems. I don't try to make the starving children hungrier. I didn't make a tsunami happen. I don't buy bear bile.
She stopped abruptly and turned into him. “Ben, you’ve got to listen to me!”
2With whom the kings of the earth have committed fornication, and the inhabitants of the earth have been made drunk with the wine of her fornication.
Both are good games. But. The elder in me still misses Mute Mondays.
-Add in a 1/2 cup of Balsamic Vinegar and 1/2 cup of Soy Sauce and let simmer for 5-8 minutes or until leaves are soft but not brown. (*I always eye ball this part, so adjust according to taste.)
My Friend James from Atlanta, Georgia, had chosen to shave his legs (yep, with a razor) as an assignment for his Women Studies' course. He kindly gave me the permission to repost his experience with photos. He might also pop in to answer questions and debate with ya'll. I salute James and his courage to carry out this project. It's high time we examine the gender issues we take for granted.
Actually, I wouldn't be surprised if someone - perhaps not a senior court official - did compare the dog to the "secular lawyer" who used to annoy the Ultra-Orthodox patrons of the Beth Din. Something along the lines of "He's as difficult to shift as Whatsisname was"; or "Looks like Whatsisname's come back as a dog". Hilarity ensued. Says another, "You kids, make yourselves useful and throw a few rocks at him!" "Serves him right, the apostate swine". Etc, etc.
Iraq?
After all that rambling, you must be wondering about my uncontrolled experiment. Well, I’ve been trying to get into the habit of going to the gym – even if I only do 20 minutes on the treadmill. Friends are inviting me for walks, bike rides and hikes… but I’m declining. I want to focus on establishing the habit of exercising at the gym before I try and throw anything else into the mix. The other day though, I wondered how a 25 minute workout at the gym compares to 25 minutes spent using the Xbox. So, I tested it out. It was an experiment because I wore the same heart rate monitor for each activity and the same clothes. The time might have been out by a couple of minutes because I often forget to start the heart rate monitor’s training session… Both sessions were conducted this week, at approximately 9.15pm.
nibble those long fingers,
I was amazed how well these things work. I ordered them for a person at work and they let me try them. I want some for myself now! They would be so great to have when you go someplace really, really noisy. The thing that really got me was that it blocked all the sounds in our shop but when people talked to you, you could hear them! Love, love, love them!
One speaker in particular Debbie Neal, Executive National Vice President at Arbonne stood out from all the rest for me. During her presentation, I was moved to tears at least twice (OK those of you who know me, understand I cry easily) because I was able to see her dream and understand exactly what is required of me to achieve the possible.
Paul Hamilton Hayne
It is, of course, protected by copyright. So play nice.
The Florida Republican's plunge into the explosive politics of immigration has sparked admiration from some undocumented young people, who welcome his promised attempt to help them live and work here legally without encouraging more illegal migrations.
Its tiring to hear that people are still abiding to standard rules set by society. I wish I could sit down with every high school senior that thinks they have to go to college as soon as they graduate, and blindly pick a major they have no desire to pursue. It seems that people are getting too involved in idealistic ways and having a much harder time evaluating and distinguishing what is best for them.
But to forgive doesn’t mean that I forget. I still remember, and still feel terrible remorse. It’s a very difficult emotion to explain; remorse without a dread of retribution. It’s simply me hating who I’ve been, and perhaps somehow feeling that I haven’t changed as much as I would like. I can still look at the worst version of myself, and know that this is how I am remembered. That he is still me.
"You're mine now. What a tasty meal you'll make." Its voice was a dry rattle, but its teeth didn't look old and brittle. Its mouth yawned, opening wider to impossible angles.
Freder, then, is a man of unusual vision. Or is he? Amid our own media cacophony of political ideologies and sympathetic appeals, all dismissible with cynicism or sheer volume, what one thing always seems to pierce through? Sex. It motivates us on a base, and deep, level; it defeats arguments and energizes us when our energy’s lacking. Maria must be this for Freder. Whatever else she is, or says she is, she is beautiful. She is a fantasy for him: a stunning zealot who brings meaning to his aimless life, stroking his ego with her conviction that he—flighty, trite, entitled Freder—is the Mediator that Metropolis needs to survive.
— Corrie ten Boom
an become a war bride.
I started out with their original "1905" Salad and a cup of Cafe Con Leche (espresso Cuban coffee with steamed milk). For lunch I had the Cannelloni de Langosta (a seafood stuffed cannelloni). And then for dessert...
I'm also feeling a lot better about the next coming year. I can continue to pump every 2 hours, and just feed her whatever I pump in the SNS. I am feeling good about the future.
Next up the lovely Christina from Carolina Charm!
Patrick Browne, Professor of Biochemistry at Howard Hughes Medical Institute/Stanford University is putting together meat-substitutes made from PLANT materials.
It was all very enjoyable and the time flew by. Several children were interested enough to buy my books, which was also nice. :-)
Step 1. Generally speaking, after walking into the room and finding your sleeping husband vibrating your eardrums, gently slip into bed with such ease as not to wake him but with a tiny little bounce.
I left the house without my hat (and I always run in a hat), but it wasn’t disastrous. I did remember my watch and ipod.
**Quick Note: This device also utilizes Micro-USB as do most new smart phones in the market today. It is the new standard for cell phone chargers and thus will eliminate a lot of redundant chargers in our homes, offices, and cars.
Daily Pioneer
If you stop by, please leave a comment.
Fringe - it's the villains that make the heroes in any genre show and Fringe has some great villains in Jared Harris as David Allen Jones (all your best crazies use all three of their names when referring to themselves). I am so happy that the show gets another half season to finish out it's terrific five year story arc. For all of you who were reluctant to give this show a chance, it's one of the programs you need to commit some of your summer viewing time to. John Noble (as Walter Bishop) heads one of the greatest casts ever put together and I never thought I would say to anyone how much I enjoy Joshua Jackson as Peter Bishop. Despite most J.J. Abrams projects, this one has focus. The season finale was full of exciting surprises and top notch special effects. It also broke my heart which all my most favorite series often seem to do.
Broadsheet newspapers also changed their approach. In 1968, in it’s coverage of the Rolling Stones’ trial for the possession and use of illegal drugs, The Times came out in their defence. Of course, the more conservative papers – Daily Express and Daily Mail – bemoaned the seeming collapse of civilisation. Each of the new excesses, whether it be the annual Beatles Mods and Rockers at Margate, the extraordinary phenomenon of ‘Beatlemania’ or the rise and rise of the mini-skirt, was played on the front page.
Extremely Loud and Incredibly Close tells the story of Oskar Schell, an autistic boy whose father died alone with many on 9/11. Oskar is having a difficult time adjusting to his father’s death, considering how close they had been. In fact, they’d been so close Oskar once told his mother that he wished she had died instead of him. At one point Oskar finds a blue vase in his father’s closet, which – upon breaking – is revealed to contain a small white envelope containing an old key. Oskar, being extremely inquisitive, wants to find the lock which this key opens, and his only clue is the name “Black” that is written on the envelope. He makes a list of everybody with the name Black who lives in New York and begins his search for the mystery lock.
“M” – Encroaching goblin with tent (Neon Rays + NP01)
Q064) The ice cream flavour you like is?
--From Amazon.
Thank You! For the lovely award ;)
People with angina are at risk of having a heart attack. Stable angina occurs during exertion, can be quickly relieved by resting or taking nitroglycerine, and lasts from three to 20 minutes.
Plus (PLUS!) there are prizes to be had! Including books, critiques and gift cards! Questions to answer! Games to win! And my own pet project--a collaborative writing experiment, in which we put Steve INTO his own stories.
Have you all been following Cupcakegate? I caught wind of it through the bon appetit blog, and have found several articles about the TSA banning someone's cupcake in a jar that they wanted to bring on the plane with them. It's been really funny/interesting to follow the chain of events about it.
The Juniors from Hatfield obviously were very young and pocket size when they recorded their only 7". A 15-year old Mick Taylor strummed the strings, and rumour has it, that one of them played in an embryonic line-up of Jethro Tull. Brian and John Glasscock later formed The Gods with Mick. +++
On floats the sea in distant blue careering through its channels,
Throughout my first year of college I was traveling to a fro a lot, I fell asleep on the train journey home numerous times and ended up in Huddersfield! But it was worth it, Saddleworth was a good place to grow up. There wasn’t much to do in the village so the older people in our group put on raves in the quarries, tunnels and valleys, they all DJed at them – Techno and House mainly, I’d always be there, I remember wanting to be the one behind the decks so badly, but they never took me seriously!!
But earlier that day, Apatow, who’d experienced a recent spike in his blood pressure, had a nuclear stress test at Cardiology Associates of Fairfield County in Trumbull. In the test, a small amount of a radioactive material is injected into the veins and used to help track blood flow to the heart.
That will leave you in debt
See you on Monday! Thanks for reading Four Quarters! Also follow me on twitter @MikeVmos
And what of snow was still around;
leaving bloodless corpses
Obviously, it's not as simple as all that; for one thing, there isn't a lot of straight fantasy which is very like 'Heaven Can Wait'. Oddly, one of the closest touchstones I have for it is Scott Lynch's 'The Lies of Locke Lamora' (though the similarity is much stronger between 'Lies' and 'Some Kind of Angel', and my books are rather more child-friendly), a book I didn't actually enjoy that much.
One of the most influental and critically acclaimed blues guitarists and singers of the last four decades, Robert Cray's 1983 Bad Influence album was the one to put him on the map though he had to have wait a further three years until his mainstream breakthrough, Strong Persuader, in 1986. This live take of the title track of his 1983 album was recorded in Chicago.
Synonyms : Arbitrary, Erratic, Helter-skelter. Scattered, Stray
Once I had that truth, it was now time to move on to the next series of trials. I now understood Gods pattern in my life to know how He reveals Himself to me. A part of how He does that is through trials. As we continued on our time in El Salvador, still facing the daily burdens and minuscule challenges, I came to a point in the road of lacking trust and not being fully obedient. And it was interesting to see how God revealed these errors in me. There are certain things that had happened during my time in El Salvador, that really challenged my trust in not only Him, but also in His appointed leaders over me and my obedience, ultimately to Him. As these trials came, I brought them before the throne and petitioned God. I wrestled once again, but didn’t try to win, rather tried to understand. Through my praying and fasting, the Lord revealed yet another truth.
being your mother is a mish-mosh of naps, spilled drinks, trips to the park, bike-riding lessons and bedtime stories. i pack your lunches at night so we don't have to rush in the morning. i lay out socks, shoes, jackets in easy-to-reach spots so you can get yourselves ready with ease. i brush your teeth. i help you make your beds. i fix zippers and snaps you can't yet reach. i make sure homework (mar) and extra clothing for accidents (jack) are in your backpacks. i hug. i kiss. i tell you i love you.
Questions I answered. (don’t copy/paste these–scroll down for yours).
I thought this was a beautifully thought out post that sums up exactly how I feel about my own parenting decisions. If you don't already know of The Analytical Armadillo, I highly recommend you find her and read her. Such a conscious parent.
Add the lemon juice to the preserving pan and cook over high heat. You want to cook this into a syrup that is 222°F. How long it takes depends on the size and shape of your pan. I use a maslin pan and it takes about half an hour.
I used fairytale papers from trimcraft,The die cut bunting is from the tea party range by dovecraft,The image was coloured with promarkers.I made the card blank witj nesties
Exploring more of this fascinating country and bringing it to life inside me so that I can weave the next chick flick or whatever it is that will make me: h a p p y.
"Wishing you Sunshine and Happiness"
I made a no-sew pillow using a down pillow that had seen better days and this no-sew pillow tut from the hilarious Cassie at Hi Sugarplum. Since it's basically ironing and cutting, even I could handle it!! The key was the Peel n Stick fabric fuse. It works like a charm and made the pillow so easy to make!
“No, of course not. I like Jeff. He’s a good guy and you two are going to be very happy.”
If you don't want the orange flavor, you can skip the Grand Marnier and orange zest and use something else - lemon zest or kirsch or caramel or strong coffee or amaretto or raspberry or Bailey's. You'll find a good combination.
With that I just smiled, nodded, and continued my game. To this day she brings it up, still uncertain of how I did it. Its endearing and is one of my favorite memories from that era.
making friends.
I know we tend to think of “the olden days” as a time when women necessarily married for money and then pined away for love all the rest of their days, but in the 19th century ideas of romantic love and “companionate marriage” were superseding the old patriarchal model of arranged, economic marriages. This was the golden age of all things sentimental. I can’t listen to this song without laughing, but if I were a Victorian lady, I’d probably be bawling my eyes out.
After I got home, I cooked John and I some dinner and then I packed up all my Christmas dishes in the Dining Room cupboard and all of John's grandmother's china. That was no small fete let me tell you!
Ever get really anxious about who you’ll be sitting next to on a long cross-country flight? Or even worse, a cross-Atlantic flight? Dutch airline KLM is trying something new with their Meet & Seat program. Passengers can pick their seats prior to boarding based on Facebook and LinkedIn profiles. Its basically like a Match.com, except for airplane seating!
Once again cheers for a great day lads and lasses. Hope to see you all again soon.
The first thing that came to mind
Fareda: Patience, willpower, and intelligence are enough for me to learn.
For today though I thought I'd do a first day of school post as today is my OFFICIAL first day of graduate school and many of my friends that are teachers start back today!
The travel and tourism industry impacts not just the economy and jobs but also the quality of life for area residents. Accommodations, attractions, restaurants, museums, parks...all are maintained by well-trained staff and very often assisted by dedicated volunteers.
On Saturday I was feeling really nervous about if people were going to come or not. We didn't have any type of RSVP so we didn't know. We set the room up for about 100 people. Right before it started I told my friend Cara that I was nervous about if people would come or not. Her response hit me square in the heart, she said "Whoever is suppose to be here will be here." She reminded me that God was in control and would bring exactly who He wanted. Almost every chair was filled. We had family, friends from BSF, friends from church and even a few people we barely knew. Again, we were blown away.
“They are so clever, calculating and unmistakeably humanlike in their behaviour.”
A good point is brought up, but this is something any blogger or journalist can study and bring to attention of the Dewan.
If you have made it to the end of this letter...a special thanks to you for reading. Mother or father, sister or brother...you may have experienced something like this yourself. You will know that sometimes it is best to talk about it or in my case, write about it. I have faith.
Implicit Unbind causes the connection to detach from the transaction when it ends. After detaching, additional requests on the connection are performed in autocommit mode. The System.Transactions.Transaction.Current property is not checked when executing requests while the transaction is active. After the transaction has ended, additional requests are performed in autocommit mode.
13. “Violence of the Lambs”: quesions posed and explored in this essay: Are animals starting to attack humans? What will happen as we continue to destroy animals natural habitat? How do we explain the multiple account of bizarre animal violence towards humans? Where is the world headed? A pomo, semi-serious take on the end of the world and a (building?) war of humans V animals.
Every day I want to tell those I love just how much I do. I want to hug and kiss my son, husband, and even the dogs! I want to keep a clean house, but also keep my sanity. I will continue to take so many pictures that it makes everyone crazy, and I'll also do my best to be social.
It is a difficult thing to handle, even though you KNOW there is the potential. I hate it. I hate seeing an animal suffer. It all began three days ago and I think I have slept maybe twelve hours during the whole time. I am tired and he is just progressively getting worse. No matter what we have done or tried…nothing has helped. To make matters worse, he has somehow developed bloat along with scours. He has been medically treated. And still he slowly slides downhill.
1 cold
Across the street, I spotted ThreadCount – an amazing source for bed and bath linens and more. They obviously have lots of gorgeous sheets and towels, also beautiful Dransfield and Ross place settings. I must have sniffed every Lafco candle in the shop – they make one for each room: Breakfast Room, Kitchen, Guest Room, Sun Room, Foyer, Patio… I just love the concept of having a signature scent for each environment in your home.
Class II cross-slabs date from Nechtan’s reform: either mounted warriors conversing with angels, or the cross carefully fused with pre-Christian symbols which were familiar, the message was clear: landed Pictish aristocrats are following in the ways of Christian heroes – and you can too!
The man spoke, his voice raspy. “Right, I know. I just figured you knew I have been getting you all through since Beta.” He turned on another computer screen, which showed a series of hallways one by one. “All the alarms were put on rotation by me, as soon as I recognized your pattern. I have to admit, you have perfect timing. No anomalies whatsoever; The Brain has no idea you are here.”
speaks in volumes, where we have a clearer understanding on the termintimacy.To draw
Contempt is one thing, impeachment of Holder should begin, and we should get to the bottom to what Obama knew and when he knew it.
7). Resurrected project: 28mm Wild West
In just a little bit, I'm also going get started on the electronic rotation chart I mentioned in my Needing Ideas post. I'll show you what I come up with later.
By the time my teens were over, I stopped treating my breasts like a dirty, little secret and started to use them to my advantage. I realized that they were handy things to have on the dating scene; finally connecting the dots that big boobs = attention from guys. So I’m a little slow, shut up.
Humanity Plus UK – Rachel Armstrong 2010 (01-03)
Parked outside my door I think he realised that change is possible. I was home... and happy to be.
However, all humans have done is to release the energy stored in the bowels of the earth. This, in turn, begins a new era of possibilities for evolution. Whether humans, or for that matter 99.9% of the species on the planet, die off like in the Precambrian extinction is irrelevant. There will be some carbon based life which will survive to breed like cockroaches after nuclear fallout.
Is it reasonable or ethical to want anything beyond what we actually need? Is it ethical to go on vacation when there are starving children? Should we save all year and donate thousands to UNICEF? Is it ever okay to go on a trip aimed at enjoying the world we are fortunate enough to be visiting?
And Rick Perry is just too dumb and slow
In case Apple does release a TV, which I doubt: I remember clearly everyone laughing at the iPod, the iPhone, and the iPad. No one’s laughing anymore.
It's difficult to do 100%. For example, how do you make your own corn chips to go along with your freshly-made pico de gallo? For those food items you must purchase, they give you tips on the healthiest choices. For pasta dishes, they recommend the whole wheat variety.
In 2010, there were 43 new posts, growing the total archive of this blog to 44 posts. There were 62 pictures uploaded, taking up a total of 34mb. That’s about 1 pictures per week.
Monet’s “Water Lilies” at Nelson-Atkins. Not us. Image from flickr.com
Definitely, I like this video, though I might say it is quite typically new-west-band. I don’t care. I laugh at the ending of the video since the band are running to the tree instead of the pretty girl. So it is, since the first time they are amazed with the beauty of the cherry blossom tree NOT the girl on the TV. Oh, one more thing, I think the vocal of this band is quite unique.
One of the Super Falcons stands propped up in Hawkes’ workshop in Point Richmond. Two hemispheres of Plexiglas curve up from the top of the cigar-shaped submarine, resembling fighter jet cockpits. Hawkes clambers into the front cockpit and explains the technology involved. A joystick steers the submarine. Instruments indicate cabin pressure and oxygen content in the air. A compass and artificial horizon provide orientation even in murky water.
Colonia Juarez is now an oasis of American suburban life in a rough Mexican border region. Along orderly streets, brick houses stand with tire swings and trampolines on neatly cut lawns, and ruddy blond residents rope cattle and drive pick-ups.
While, like The Arabist, I wasn't eager to see either a Muslim Brotherhood candidate win or ‘Omar Suleiman return, and Hazem Abu Isma‘il would be arguably worse than either, the mass disqualifications here are reminiscent of the Mubarak era, where the rules were constantly manipulated to produce the desired results. Some have suspected all along that the Egyptian Establishment (though that itself seems fragmented these days) had decided on Amr Moussa as the next President: but he would not get there without clearing aside these other "front-runners" (if, in fact, that's what they were). Abdel-Mouneim Abu'l-Futuh, who has appeal to both liberals and Islamists, is probably the other major alternative to Moussa, assuming the disqualifications stand.
He also threw in an adorable card (with pugs!) and some double-stick tape so I can make some great new collages. I’ll take a gift like this over flowers any day!
So it's something I'm learning as an adult. I'm learning that eating delicious things makes me healthier than diet-and-shameful-binge cycles. I'm learning that asking for sex doesn't always get me laid but it has a much better track record than not asking for sex. I'm learning that when I have the time and money I'm allowed to go out and do silly things. (Did you know Boston has a trampoline park?!) I'm learning that well-considered self-indulgence is not half as annoying or gross or immature as allowing yourself to turn into a big bitter ball of frustrated desires.
After you've had your fill of the brewery in Milton you'll probably want to head to Rehoboth Beach. The easiest way to get there? Just follow one of the other cars leaving the brewery... I bet 90% of the people leave the brewery and go straight to the pub. It's a short drive, maybe 10-15 minutes. It's short enough that brewery employees will go to the brewpub over their lunch break.
They stumbled, half-carrying each other, against the crowd in tunics and togas, barely shunning chariots and horses.
I love Autumn. The beautiful crisp air and rich, golden colours. The earthy scent of fallen leaves. The comfy boots and chunky knits. The irresistible pumpkin spice lattes. The alluring smell of cinnamon, nutmeg and freshly baked apples...
More interestingly/romantically? It's a well-known fact (Francoise's mother knew the woman in question) that the house was inhabited, prior to WWII, by a young woman who was a poet. Her lover was an Englishman...an artist who (to the scandal of the neighborhood) came to live there in the late thirties.
But without hope, I cannot get out of bed in the morning.
12/02/2010 BUY 0.02 xauusd 1385.51 12/03/2010 1396.38 +21.73
Don’t raise your voice in an argument even if they are screaming and shouting at you, regardless of how angry you are, raising your voice will make them feel you are patronizing and treating them like a child – even if they are behaving like one, this won’t help. Tone is taken a lot harshly to someone with BPD.
Photo from myecoproject.org
so, yes.
- storm water management pond and rain garden to control storm water overflow
Caroline: This is not like me, the only thing I’ve ever lost is my virginity.
The Night Circus - Erin Morganstern
The impression that lingered from that time was so negative, provincial, blinkered and anti-musical that it still rankles a quarter-century later. Today, though, I can recognise the good things I learned there too. These include a passion for Monteverdi (well, I already had that beforehand, but never mind); a familiarity with the Bach Cantatas that I would never otherwise have acquired; an inspirational course on German Romantic opera from Weber to Tannhauser (thank you, Prof Deathridge!); close-knit seminars on Gershwin and Schubert's Winterreise with Robin Holloway; and analysis with the late Derrick Puffett, the man who steered me - again by coincidence - towards Die tote Stadt.
The only way out of this trap is to pursue what Flanagan calls the “Rutgers solution:” decide Polly and Pip will go to a regional or state university, set goals accordingly, and let any other extra stuff come from their interest and their discretion. While this doesn’t actually sound that bad, it essentially precludes the potential of either of them making the leap into greatness, into the realm of the global elite. And that potential, however small, is difficult for me – the product of upwardly mobile parents and weaned on the idea that anyone can become president - to let go of.
We'll be starting up our regular meetings again in a few weeks; the second Tuesday of each month, as usual.
Dawkins’s Critique of Design
If you have a summer baby, the Mermaid theme is perfect. You can set out a few different kinds of sprinkler heads and get a slip and slide for the backyard. Have the guests bring bathing suits and let the girls run around and splash in the sun. Make sure you have plenty of sunscreen! Once they have tired themselves out, you can serve fish shaped sandwiches and French fries and then onto the Mermaid cake.
There were so many things that I didn’t notice before we purchased this house (it actually kind of blows my mind because I’m the person at the mall who goes back to the store three times before actually buying a shirt, let alone a house that apparently I noticed nothing about). So far there have been no unsavory surprises, just little upgrades that the seller made that Mike and I would have been too cheap to make: like really fancy curtain rods and vent covers.
Well another month in this new school year as gone by. We have learned all about bats, and we went to the pumpkin patch this week for our first field trip of the year. We also learned all about pumpkins and did several pumpkin activities. (pictures to come) I think my kiddos have the life cycle of a pumpkin down to a fine art!
Yes, I know. This one is very similar to yesterday. But that's ok, right? It sure speaks volumes with how I'm feeling right about now - hehehe. Click on the image below to go to my box.net account to download the PNG file, and leave some love if you like my work. Thanks!
Suppose we want a Marker constrained to the parabola along with a display of the tangent and normal, as well as the directrix. The fixed distance from the point on the parabola to the directrix and axis of symmetry is also drawn.
Instead of worrying about my hand at the time, I asked Dr. Eric to look at Prince...and again, he suggested to put him down...I'm in such a dilemma...Prince is his sweet self again...as he has always been, calm, and nice...fighting to stay alive!
Lips: Brazen blam stick in Snazzy.
Governor's and Ogilvie was one of only two Dundas intersections projected to be a problem in both low population growth and high population growth.
When we talk about Web filtering, people automatically envision blocking things like sex and gambling sites, but there is much more to it than that. Depending on the age of your children, you will want to block different things. For the younger user ou may want to block social networking, email and chat sites except the ones that you have specifically allowed for example. You should review all of the available categories and think about them carefully when deciding. You can of course change your settings as often as you like, but you will likely settle on something and not have to change it very often.
600g Hong Kong Flour
Here we go, the disgusting song was playing and I was trying to locate those freedom fighters. Well they were there, but not doing what I thought there were going to do, Instead kicking some ass, all I saw was their ass were up on air and hip hop boys doing some things only you can imagine. Cell phone paparazzi are rolling their cameras and those three girls were in a fight to keep their skirts down.
So if you need advice, seek me out at: MDenningRN61@gmail.com and I will aid you in giving your body the BEST shot at recovery!
3. Personally redesign my blog
Here is my ATCs for your enjoyment. I kind of got carried away with the theme, so I created 5 ATCs for the Blog Hop.
I refused to work on Saturday, even though I probably could have saved myself the Sunday work, but we had friends from Vancouver in town, and I wanted to have one fun weekend day!
As we finished our food, the school kids appeared as well as a 3 year old boy. Michael had so much fun playing with a boy his age since usually the kids at the playground are older and mostly ignore him. After the 3 year old went home, Michael actually got to play with some older kids which was so nice to see for a change (he always tries, this time he had success).
"Oh...... you mean there are animal faeces in the green bin? Well no wonder they wouldn't pick up."
Show Schedule: Sun 1-5pm; M-Th 9-9 F & Sat 10 - 6
Fresh off of their new album session for the highly anticipated "Closer" in late March 1980, Joy Division were once again back to performing live gigs and rehearsing in the studio. The album itself was comprised of many new songs that fans had already heard and been excited about as they performed them live. It was to be a major release, especially when
Many people think that children need this and that… A ton of toys, clothes etc when really what kids need most is love, acceptance, support and encouragement from the people they love and look up to.
The defining space positions of a many-particle system in a time elevator
This morning I woke up to Ellie at 5:55 complaining of a bad dream. After my futile attempt to get us both back to sleep, Kate woke up crying from a wet diaper. I was so tired so I put both girls in my bed with me and tried desperately to sneak 10 more minutes of sleep before greeting my day. The three of us girls lay there in the dark all snuggled up together. Ellie and Kate were holding hands. It was the sweetest moment and it made me think ahead to just a few short years from now when my girls will not be with me all the time, every moment of the day. I want to have the appreciation now, not later. So I just lay there very still and tried to absorb every second of that perfection before both girls were climbing on me, impatiently waiting and whining for one thing or another (although that too is also a blessing in it's own right).
Baked this cake for my mom's birthday. Unfortunately, the feedback wasn't that great. Probably because I omitted the egg yolks. The cake is soft but not chiffon kind of soft. But still, it looked pretty, right? In my quest of searching a 'fresh cream' recipe that doesn't include fat for mom, I came across Swiss Meringue. Well, it shouldn't be categorised as cream but it functioned very much like one. It's actually cooked egg whites with sugar, marshmallow tasty. The only thing is that it tastes too sweet. As this is my first trial, I did not reduce sugar. It spreads easily on the cake and sets/holds it shape pretty well. It has a glossy look too.
and turn down the gas until the raging flame
For the conversion, I used the Asus Transformer Prime profile in DVD Catalyst 4.
倾倾我我
Limited head
10) TWITTER!
The new Headmistress, Professor McGonagall,
RUGBY is core business for Dunedin City Council
This is a fun activity, whether or not you are using Mapstart!
So get out some night this month and take a close look at our neighbor, Jupiter. And if possible, see if you can see the moons. Newton is playing the tune, and the moons do the dance – music of the spheres indeed!
Our path widens
All the good you've done in me
What Were You Expecting
It Was Inevitable
Khutorskoi, a martial arts expert who worked as a security guard at punk rock shows and Antifa events, was twice targeted in attacks in 2005 in connection with his Antifa links, which may have been a primary motive in the killing, investigators said in a statement.
Trayvon, 6-foot-3 and 140 pounds, then reportedly climbed on top of the 250-pound Zimmerman and bashed his head into the sidewalk several times.
Why publish a zine?
"You know what 'Los Castellanos' like to say, Little Burro announced to the group in her foghorn voice. 'Everyone knows how to dance. Only we 'gitanas' know how to walk."
I germinated and replanted over a few days week before last and have sprouts already coming up. Beans, okra and lettuce and I already hit them fuckers with Sevin insecticide. I also dusted all the peppers, melons and cukes then hit the tomatoes last. I really hated to do the tomatoes because there were a bunch of ladybugs in there doing a job on the aphids, but they just weren't cutting it.
2nd level is the grass and garden.
Well, I better go. Big day ahead in every aspect.
Some things just make my head hurt. For instance trying to calculate fuel consumption for my Hatteras. After doing some research and investigating the many different variables, I decided that without installing flow meters on each of the Detroit engines a guesstimate would have to do.
For the day the SPX/DOW were +0.75%, and the NDX/NAZ were +0.65%. Bonds gained 11 ticks, Crude added 30 cents, Gold rallied $14.00, and the USD was lower. Support for the SPX remains at the 1386 and 1372 pivots, with resistance at the 1440 and 1499 pivots. Short term momentum busted right through the slight negative divergence and hit extremely overbought. Tomorrow, Q1 GDP at 8:30, (estimates between +2.5% to +2.9%). Then Consumer sentiment around 10:00.
This feels appropriate since A Beer for the Shower is also in the funny biz.
Quilting and teaching entered my life at about the same time.
into the branches
And, hard though it is to believe, very few people will even notice, preferring as they do the soap opera to the cold wind of reality .
I’m counting down the days until I get to party with Jimmy and Susie Hamburger.
Julia started nursing shortly after birth and really didn't doze off until 9pm. She woke frequently for nursing until about 4 am and then slept time I woke her at 7 am. That was pretty much her routine on the inside too. ;)
God has been giving me such peace throughout all this. And energy. While waiting today, I reviewed some of my Bible verse cards. These two spoke to my heart:
2010.08.20 Pakistan Dera Ismail Khan 2 1 Islamic militants are suspected of gunning down two cops.
And now, over 50,000 words in, she has finally revealed her secrets to me. The secrets she had hidden from her shrink and even from herself.
How do you celebrate the holiday? Or do you?
Please note that this photo is not of me nor is it my bathroom. My bathroom has been undergoing a Never Ending Reno for about three years now. I think my living room may take just as long the way things are going. That's okay though, one day at a time, right? I've been purging and throwing things out like crazy. It helps me deal with stress. Seriously. Try it sometime. I tried to get Mr LC on board last night. I think he lasted five minutes and then had to go to bed. Really. I mean, who wants VCR tapes when you don't have a VCR?
I do not know why.
J: I love Sperry topsiders or Stubbs and Wootton for the groom.
I'm also having my first Guinness in 9 months. So right now, life is pretty fucking good.
She loves
I best get the needle a flyin',
We passed some friendly hikers as we broke out above the trees. They were on their way down. Unlike those jerks below, they actually responded.
Lunch: leftover spaghetti with soya mince
stamps - barry winter (stamp fairy)
Tinashe leaves the stage to huge applause and is shortly followed by Coco Sumner, aka I Blame Coco, who launches straight into her set of big bold tunes.
At our friend's cabin upstate, Toby loved the friendly grown-ups and wanted to be in the middle of the action at all times. But Alex and I could only chase him around and keep him from falling off the dock for so long, so the sling turned out to be a perfect way to keep him happy and immersed. Here, we're fishing with friends--it was the first time for both Toby and me! (We caught nothing:)
Button: craft supply
She was 19 and living in Budapest when she applied for a summer job in Canada that would solve her money problems.
we were having today...... and lots of other days recently *
i am looking forward to a jam packed weekend of graduations, graduation parties, honey do shower, and working on some customer scrapboks. hope to get it all done.
* Dr Farish A. Noor is a senior fellow at the Nanyang Technological University, Singapore.
J: Can you describe Trent in one word?
7. When you read a good book do you cry, get depressed or be upset about the end of the book? (By this I mean the fact that the book ends and not the actual text within the end of a book)
Last week, there was a report in this newspaper that the Housing and Environment Minister, Dr. Roodal Moonilal, disclosed a new housing policy. According to that report, the new policy will favour distribution of serviced lots, with foundation slabs, over the provision of new homes. I have been calling for a review of our housing policy for some time now, so it was very disappointing to read that Cabinet had recently approved this important new policy without some formal process of dialogue or seeking wider views, much less a thorough examination of the shortcomings of the 2002 policy. Yes, a new housing policy was sorely needed, but there are solid benefits to wider dialogue.
They aren’t used to that as people have forgotten good manners and common courtesy toward each other.
The master of the short story has written a novella which is both a love story and a portrait of an entire community. A young man returns to the home of his youth to sell it after his parents’ death and sets in train a series of events which ends in tragedy. Misunderstandings, and wrongly interpreted signals play a part in a the story which is full of the warmth and ease of summer despite the shadows and the pain.
My only reservation is that when the author got to the end of the book it was as if he suddenly just gave up and finished writing.
I'm back in England again!
Given all the immediate dangers associated with bombarding the atmosphere with sulphur dioxide, along with the unknown dangers of other geo-engineering projects, many people are concerned that “chemtrails” could be a secret component of the same agenda to alter the Earth’s eco-system.
I look forward to receiving and evaluating your submissions. Please email them to me at my usual address - karlshuker@aol.com
But life has a way of providing warmth both physically and inwardly when you least expect it. Like yesterday when I received this cheerful and very warm sweater cowl from my sweet friend Vicki over at 2 Bags Full that I was lucky to win in her most recent giveaway. Vicki also sells these lovely upcycled sweater cowls in her Etsy Shop that she creates out of retired or vintage sweaters.
An emotional response?
I have now been scrapbooking for 3 years. I initially began scrapping as a fun way to preserve my family's memories, but now, it's all this and a whole lot more!
1 skittered
So out of a combination of enthusiasm, awe, and feeling the Christmas spirit, I've decided that some of the winners are interesting enough to post about; I've chosen, I think, four in particular. Maybe five. (They're really good).
For a bit of history, Banana Republic has had slim-fit shirts for years. They’ve even had shirts they called the stretch poplin. So they are no stranger to stretch or slim-fitting shirts. However, the new shirts combine both elements and the results are a thicker fabric than the stretch poplin, and a fit that is an actual slim fit as opposed to the perpetrators of before.
2 windows
A sharp mentor or a student might ask, “So what? What difference does it make that you’ve seen the novel as a collage?”
"Our ultimate weapon is not our guns, but our beliefs. (Applause.) "There is a myth that though we love freedom, others don't; that our attachment to freedom is a product of our culture; that freedom, democracy, human rights, the rule of law are American values or Western values; that Afghan women were content under the lash of the Taliban; that Saddam was somehow beloved by his people; that Milosevic was Serbia's savior." "Ours are not Western values. They are the universal values of the human spirit, and anywhere -- (applause) -- anywhere, any time ordinary people are given the chance to choose, the choice is the same: freedom, not tyranny; democracy, not dictatorship; the rule of law, not the rule of the secret police".
17. Sing Little Bird Sing
He also suggested that any parties that have the means or state governments that claim to have been affected seriously, like Selangor, should file an injunction to secure a court order to restrain or prohibit both the EC chairperson and his deputy from continuing to meddle with the affairs of the EC until their positions are clarified.
Something I really wanted to do this year was have meals that made great left overs the next night to make the early evenings a little easier with two kids! 'Cook once, eat twice' meals are great aren't they.
I was also fairly confident in dealing with difficult and hostile students. I attributed this to having been a high school teacher for about ten years. Adolescents are by nature difficult and hostile. I regarded the adults in our classes at UO as fairly pliable and easy to control. As I had been teaching for much of my career in a “diverse” high school with a variety of races, religions, and general nuttiness, I was fairly comfortable in dealing with diverse groups. Probably I overestimated my capability in this regard, but in general I was more relaxed in dealing with hostile students than my fellow teachers.
They did not receive the testimony of the Apostles concerning their Messiah and because of that, “through their fall salvation is come unto the Gentiles, for to provoke them to jealousy.” (Romans 11:11) This is exactly what happened for at the mention of the much-hated Gentiles the great crowd erupted in anger. They certainly were provoked to jealousy.
“Oh yes you have, and I’ve seen it,” she said.
It seems that the wealth of the world is in the hands of a few who put measures in place so that no matter the extent of their philanthropic endeavours towards the poor, the poor will have an almost next to impossible task of recovering enough to even dream of catching up with them.
As my due date not-so-rapidly approaches, I get a lot of messages from friends saying, “Baby?” or “When are you going to go into labor?” And to them, I would like to say: I truly love you and appreciate all of your concern. But obviously, if you haven’t heard from me, I am still growing this little parasite and I don’t want to talk about it until she is officially OUT. And sleeping in a bassinet. And not in my rib cage. No offense. I just sort of want to grab an array of kitchen utensils and do some home surgery on myself at this point, and I just don’t have the patience to talk about how I am STILL FUCKING PREGNANT. Did I mention that I love and appreciate you? I will call you when this thing gets going.
The whole 2wks were the best of my life every day was perfect, he made everyday all the more special. Especially the day when we went on a Cruise to Victoria Canada, he proposed with a gorgeous engagement ring, and I accepted. I know Clayton is the one I am truly meant to be with and share my life with to the full; it’s funny how it all started over an IM 6 years ago. We were married 6 July 2004.
So try something different this week. Pull out that paper you have collecting dust or add a shot of unexpected color to your project! Who would have thought that a red rhinestone would add so much to a brown and blue color scheme? Sometimes we have to be a little daring! Go for it! And have a wonderful Saturday!
Let sit for 20 minutes then pop into a well preheated 400* oven and bake for 30-40 minutes. The top of the bread should be beautifully browned. Remove from oven and let cool before serving.
At home it was a different story.
Wow! I knew it had been a long time since I posted, but I didn't think it had been three weeks. I wish it was because I got a new job, or I was writing a brilliant novel, or I've globe trotting, or having martini's by the pool with a very fit 1950's Richard Widmark. Sigh. But no, life here has be B-O-R-I-N-G boring. I haven't been bothered by the mundacity, no wait I mean mundanity. Maybe a girl should pick up a dictionary every once in a while. Anyhoo I was saying that I haven't been bothered by the boring nature of my existence. In fact I hadn't noticed until I was chatting with mi vampiro.
- Polyester fiberfill
I suppose I feel that no one is taking me seriously. You would think that with all the advances of medicine that there would be many doctors out there who would specialize in women like me - perimenopausally challenged. There are a lot of us out here. I mean, it is such a complex conglomeration of symptoms that are different in all of us - worthy of more research if you ask me.
This review is from: Starting Over Book One: More Than a Job (Kindle Edition)
strangers hesitate.
When Legacy was put down this spring, I was angry, I was furious, I kicked and screamed at the world, completely unable to accept that this was his time. Now, I don’t feel that way. I know it was her time. She has had a good life. I am not angry. Just sad. And at the same time, I am honored to have known her. I am honored that I get to raise her wonderful foal.
To save money Elsie and I decided to go the hostel route. We stayed at Condominum Parque, a little hostel that ended up being a block and a half from El Conde, the main walking street in the Zona Colonial. It wasn’t the Hilton, but it was clean, safe and we had a light breakfast buffet included. We paid $22.50/person per night. With breakfast included in that, you can’t really beat it. The staff were really helpful to when we had questions about getting around.
Do you imagine that the combination of long hours, stress, and jet lag means no knitting? Think again, oh ye of little faith. The horrible weather we had all week, with downpours and wind, cold, hail and other nastiness, resulted in terrible traffic. Every morning we were stuck in traffic battling the elements and drivers who seemingly forgot how to drive in the rain. And there we were, Doug behind the wheel and me merrily knitting away. I managed to get quite a bit of the body of Leah’s sweater knit this week. Today, during a five minute break in the rain, Emma rushed Leah outside to get some photographic evidence.
The theme for this week is: Mother/Special Lady using her Favorite Colors. I created this card with my Mum in mind. She loves green so I choose this soft green from an old DCWV stack (name unknown as I tore off the front cover way back when I bought it). My image comes from Kates ABCs. I just love that cart, I think its the cutest thing ever but I hardly use it. To be honest, the thought of finding the right DP for all those layers puts me off. Lol. So I decided to give the cartridge my flair. I used the Cri-Kits to draw out the image and then I colored it with my Prismacolor pencils. I probably take longer coloring then gluing the layers but this is more me :)
“No”, said our nanny. “I saw the piggy bank after they came.”
Whether you’re the incumbent or a startup, how do you build sufficiently simple solutions to complex problems? By abstracting as much of the work that’s actually going on from what’s required of the consumer, and maniacally slashing any process or barrier that prevents consumers from getting the best possible experience. It’s all about reducing choices and unnecessary steps, narrowing clutter, and adding a touch of class to boot.
17So that the rest of men may make search for the Lord, and all the Gentiles on whom my name is named,
I taught high school and young adult literature for years. One of my favorites is a series written by Ellen Emerson White (using the pseudonym of Zack Emerson). It is the Echo Company series and deals with the Vietnam War. I have read and reread the series, but I never tire of it. Another of those I like is Julius Lester’s novelized version of Shakespeare’s Othello. Lester uses many of the original lines while creating a unique tale that brings tears to ones’ eyes. I would also include Adeline Yen Mah’s Chinese Cinderella. It is the true story of a childhood forgotten.
Well, now. You need matches to light that candle above, right? Take a look at this early tin match safe.
Oh yes, we said kiddie mosh pit. Don’t worry, the kids are all fine!
I'm sad in a way I've never felt and am holding on to all the gorgeous memories I have of a woman whose life was absolutely filled with grace and love.
Dinner on Friday night has to be a bit more special than dinner on any other night. It deserves some respect, the working week has finished, you can lie in, stay in your pjs all weekend, eat junk, get drunk (maybe all the above in one weekend, hey, I’m not here to judge!) – the world is your oyster at the weekend. Last night was not about the oysters though, it was all about the mussels. Moules mariniere to be precise. This wasn’t from my cookbook challenge – the main course was – but I was flicking through a new cooking magazine (it’s a sickness, I can’t stop myself) and saw a mussel recipe and knew instantly that I had to have some. I’m only a recent convert to mussels, I was put off eating them for a good few years after smelling some at a Chinese buffet. The scent of these poor neglected mussels was the smell of food poisoning and I knew to keep my distance. It wasn’t until I did a French cooking class last year where I didn’t want to look like an inexperienced cook that I just knuckled down and ate them and realised how delicious they are. Sometimes thats the key to trying intimidating new things – don’t hesitate, pretend you’ve eaten them loads and then see what happens. Just don’t do this at a buffet, that is not the time for experimenting! Anyway, if you’ve never had mussels, then moules mariniere is the best place to start. The mussels are cooked in a rich creamy sauce which is absolute heaven and the best thing you could ever dunk a baguette in. Seriously, try it and see. I think its the law in France that you must have some crusty bread to dunk into the sauce once you’ve polished off the mussels. When I first cooked this for the boyfriend I was convinced that he’d hate it, but he also loves it so I know I’m onto a winner with this recipe. Preparing the mussels for cooking can be a little bit fiddly as you have to debeard them (which is just pulling off the ropey material they use to cling on to rocks) and then check if any open mussels are dead. I have to admit this freaks me out a little bit as if they are open you tap them and if they are good to eat they close their shell, which means you’re cooking something which essentially is still alive when you put it in the pan. Its worth it though as they taste amazing, so please don’t let this put you off. I was told by the chef that taught me that many restaurants don’t bother checking if the mussels are good to eat or not as its very time consuming in a professional kitchen, hence why so many people get ill after eating shellfish in restaurants. So be careful.
What comes along with a husband running his own business is I am left to "drop" what I am doing or what I have planned to do in order to keep things moving. The boys are often with me morning & evening solo, and I work FT and I am training for a marathon/trying to potty train Eli. I am not quite sure just yet what is the lesser of two evils! Training a 2 1/2 year old is not going so fabulous but also what is tough is having another to run after constantly! (update...no real progress in the potty department. Eli has had a few days where he has stayed dry for very long periods of time but we are not near trained yet :( I guess giving Eli his time and not pressuring him will be the key here)
There’s also Jeannie’s brother, Joe, on the isle of Skye, Shona the red squirrel who lives in the grounds of the royal castle at Balmoral and Nessie (the Loch Ness Monster).
Hello Friends, it is Thursday. Just one more day for the weekend. :) YAY. I wanted to share this layout that I did for Kelly Purkey's Sketchbook class that I am taking on Studio Calico. Loving her sketches.
I just had to alter the Pink Floyd thing. Someone bypassed the comments, sent a kneemail to tell me that autoplay music on a site is annoying. And she's right. Because we don't all like the same music, and because you might want to read without distraction.
Arrange the wedges of one melon in an baking dish. Make the mojito mix: Place all ingredients plus 1 cup water in a blender and pulse until the mint is finely chopped. Pour the mixture over melon wedges and refrigerate 1 hour.
In between times there was wave after wave of smallpox that killed many people.
Then leaves the special gift for me!
I also think this post will help explain my fascination for texture and old things, for abandoned places and buildings, and for cemeteries. In the abstract I wrote for my advisor, I explained:
I’m back again talking about those darned graphics. The problem is that I KNOW you are creative. If you are a writer reading this blog post, you imagine all kinds of settings, characters, and plots. What’s a little graphics work to someone with your intensity and imagination?
Short-eared Owl at sunset: stretchin’, to get ready for some killin’… and eatin’. (Cape Vincent, NY)
Well those who know me well have come to realise i love to move things around,sort out my storage and keep my desk tidy....shock,horror,yes i like to keep my desk tidy :) though on occassions i have been known to craft......lol
We are all excited about the prospects of the new year...but can't quite break the old year's habit. Well its January 3rd and it's fair to say we have a Grace period to get out of the old and into the new. I wanted to finish sizzle in the old year, but in the Grace period of the new year we finished it on Sunday, January 1st.
Line sheet pans with parchment paper.
As all the tuned spheres, and that to friends;
16 long years
Volt Switch
In a funny sort of way they cancelled each other out. The garden became for us a haven of peace, a place for coming closer together yet remaining infinitely apart, independent yet together; no man (or woman) is an island sort of stuff. If we found ourselves quarreling we would simply step out into the garden, stand in front of BUDDHA ONE and BUDDHA ALSO ONE, bow, press palms together, make the OMMMMM sound and wait for the bad waves between us to subside.
So why do I do it? Simply…I want to record life. I may be the only one looking at the albums now, but I hope in the future that someone else will enjoy them to. I feel accomplished at the end of the year when I have an album completed for that year. I’d never experienced that before Project Life. I also hope that doing it now will help me in the future when I want to record life with children.
John Murray
What I do love is this blog. Now I don’t know if it’s the move or if it’s that I’ll be focusing a touch of Sweet Mother love on Le Clown this week or if it’s the dreamer in me, BUT I’ve been thinking a lot about an intern. As in, I want one. Sweet Mother has always wanted an intern. I have a tendency to grossly over estimate the value of the imaginary companies that I’ve set up, such as Sweet Mother. Today, it seems – to me – that the gross imaginary evaluation has reached a breaking point and we should hire someone.
- fabric wallets and zipper pouches from KimpossiblyKute,
Dr Dave Horton and Dr Griet Scheldeman (Lancaster University): What needs to change to get Britain on its bike? Discussing and debating the project’s key findings
It is wise for any traveler to be well verse in the wide range of words and phrases if one is not they run the risk of looking like a tosser = wanker = idiot.
United Nations Development Program and UBINIG, Bangladesh
there would be enough love to fill us all
freshly ground black pepper
carbon dioxide is a weak greenhouse gas, whose only significant absorption band is already saturated at its peak. Basic physics shows it can never have a serious effect on global temperatures and observation of the past shows that it never has had. carbon dioxide is now about 390 parts per million (ppm) in the atmosphere, which is extraordinarily low in the life of the planet, probably dangerously low for the green plants on which we depend.
“This sounds like I don’t have a choice in the matter.”
- I doubt my abilities to motivate students to create and enjoy artwork.
brought you down this path to where we
Announcement... please re-read the simple guidelines for submission (below) so you can be sure your post matches the spirit and theme of this blog hop. Please do not submit giveaway posts. Also, please remember to link your post to one of the host blogs!
“Coca-Cola Co. and PepsiCo Inc. are changing the way they make the caramel coloring used in their sodas as a result of a California law that mandates drinks containing a certain level of carcinogens bear a cancer warning label. The companies said the changes will be expanded nationally to streamline their manufacturing processes. They’ve already been made for drinks sold in California.”
When I was there yesterday it is obvious he is entering the final stages of the illness. He looks wasted to some degree, pale, weak and is disoriented. His speech is slurred and difficult to understand and his thought process is confused and not easy to follow. He is an engineer, a musician, and intellectual. He is well read, fascinated with the Civil War and those times in society. Yet here he is, his light is winking out. How helpless I feel and how frustrated it makes one to see this slow degradation of a fine person. Why him, how did nature pick him, what did he deserve to have this terrible disease visited upon him. I don't know, these are questions without answer, but the plague me.
Whew, I'm going to have to re-think this living long enough to finish it all.
some spring onion for garnishing
She proposed that gay people should move to the countryside (presumably in a state other than North Carolina) and start farms:
I used to steal the salt shaker from my mom's kitchen and go out to the garden, pick a cucumber, and sit and eat it right there. I hated working in that garden, but the food that came out of it was soo good.
So kiss your love
Two mothers cross paths in the grocery store. And as we have all experienced before, they smile in passing.
Mr Roots' version of events is rather different. He claimed that he wanted to show Mr Bailey how he was making his sauce. With that in mind, Mr Roots purchased some ingredients and, in the course of doing so, met Mr Hoffman -- whom he also invited to watch him make his sauce. Mr Roots maintains that Mr Bailey was not interested and left after a few minutes.
While others can only see weeds."
The lovely head of the College of Midwives then gets in a dig at older mothers, and how they make greater demands on maternity services. Thing is, not everyone can have children younger. They may not have met the right person with whom to bring a life into the world, or they may not have been ready to have a child (there is no way I could have handled it in my 20s), or they may not have been able to afford to.
28. My momma's birthday would have been this Sunday. I miss her :(
and explainer
We do, however, owe it to ourselves and the craft industry to at least urge everyone try craft beer. Let your passion come out when discussing your favorite beers and don’t be afraid to share some interesting information with a friend – just don’t shove it down their throats. Give them time to adjust to this amazing industry filled with thousands of beer choices.
The Entertainer or “Idol”
I didn't have any peanut butter cups or Rockstars, but I did eat a handful of peanut M&Ms, a taco from the drive-thru mexican place, and made pot pie for dinner.
I’d go to the past and get beads from all different cultures!
with bold calligraphy before our eyes!
I can live through the cold and the being alone,
Marriage break-ups and divorces
9:00 - Bedtime (otherwise known as Mommy and Daddy time!!)
Thanks to Everyone who has stuck through this blog and stuck through this post. As ever it is appreciated more than I can possibly say.
“Ok,” then he sat down. He pulled out a couple maps and started drawing on them and circling campsites.
I want you to create a card, tag or any project that relates to the harvest of the land ... you can include images of fruit, vegetables, farm vehicles ... even a scarecrow ... so get creative and come and join us in celebrating Harvest Festival
9) Don’t live in the past. Keep no records of your clients’ customer service history. If you have any questions, you can always ask them again. And again. And again.
Some things never change and even eight years on from The Dark Knight, Batman is still talking in the same voice and it’s still annoying. On the subject of voices though, Bane’s seems to have been improved after the negative reception of the first trailer (or perhaps that was just a bad line of dialogue and the rest was alright, who knows?).
What happens tomorrow is not just about the opposition or Umno-BN. It is also not just about electoral reform, given the wide spectrum of concerns. Everyone will attempt to gain political capital.
I want to write.
And the arms for my family name on the reverse (although I think techinically they should bear a bar, since we’re descended from the titled branch of the family on the wrong side of the sheets, but its not exactly casual illegitamacy as the relationship extended to several children). The velvet, being quite thick, was quite difficult to manipulate around such an awkward shape, and I would have liked the top strand of gold to be a little straighter, but in that case I had to couch through the holes JOhn had drilled in the leather.
Up (and he will point up as well)
Date: 17.3.2010
Your doctor can tell precisely what position your baby is in.
Me: Why are you lol?
This was taken on my Diana F+, using the 110 telephoto lens. I had the aperture set on the "cloudy" setting, and the film is 120 Kodak Ektachrome E100g, cross processed. This is the neg exactly as is, and i really like the style and colours.
*) Lead Muslim students in prayer at a public San Diego elementary school.
ME - Well, as it happens, I really fancy an IPA.
Wherever you are at with your learning, know that there are new distinctions that will help you with your continual improvement. One course won’t totally ’fix’ you – it will change you, in some way, and it will ADD to what you have already done, and what you will do in the future.
Thanks for stopping by and reading my blog. If you have any questions about my blog, or questions about something you've read on my blog (Design Diva with Interior Motives), please don't hesitate to ask. I love hearing from you. I always answer all emails and respond to comments (if your email is easily accessible). Happy Blogging!
It is also not very stable, meaning it will get very runny with heat but it’s in a tube so a little easier to use. Next camping trip I may just put it in the cooler where I keep my coconut oil!
"Bloody squirrels," he muttered as he wrote a cheque to cover the cost of the repairs.
it’s been a while since I attended my last writer/reader convention. The mid-1990s, I think, and it was a Science Fiction/Fantasy con not a Romance one. The same stuff was still there: panels, goody rooms, vendors, signings, costuming, parties and networking. Yep, none of that has changed, save for the whole industry-being-in-flux thing. But I apparently have changed.
Thank you for sending The List by Joe Konrath. It has a lot going for it--especially certain moments of humor--but in the end it seemed too much like the novelization of a movie than a genuine novel. The characters are types, and the echoes of such movies as Lethal Weapon became distracting. if this really were a movie tie-in, I could see pursuing it, but as it is, I'm going to pass. I'm sure you'll find the right home for it, though. - Pocket Books
And since I was messing with grainline, I decided that lining the bodice with pieces cut on the suggested grain was a good idea. Being in a colorful mindset, I went with a bit of color-blocking. Actually, the navy colored cotton was out of stock, or at least, not to be found, and since I could not decide between the two colors, I went ahead and used both.
“Perhaps it was a case of ‘too much of a good thing’,” I suggested. “I’ve heard of humans going off chocolate after binging on those dark chunky slabs they sell in the supermarket.”
Among this percentage, being ignored and disrespected were the most common forms of cyber bullying.
We are so going to get fat this winter.
He left me standing there in a pool of moonlight, my mind spinning as the stars overhead, replaying his words over and over again to seal them permanently in my memory.
Place the chicken breast pieces in a large stockpot. Mix the ⅓ portion of seasoning mix with a small amount of the chicken broth, stirring well, and pour over the chicken. Pour the remaining chicken broth over the chicken, cover the stockpot with a lid, and simmer until chicken is cooked through. When the chicken is completely cooked, remove from the stockpot and cool until you can handle it easily; shred the chicken with your hands into small bite-size pieces and return to the stockpot.
I will not put forth buds this year, my sap will not rise, for I am returning home. I’ll see you there.
H old on to what you know.
We are having a blog hop (list below), so make sure you hop to each designers blog to see the wonderful cards for Wendy! Lastly, go to the Repeat Impressions Facebook Page and wish Wendy a Happy Birthday!
The main thesis of the majority is that the only reason for the delegation of legislative powers to the Chief Executive under the Constitution, such as was done under Commonwealth Act No. 671 was because due to the emergency resulting from the war, the Legislature could not meet to enact legislation; that the moment of Legislature could convene there would no longer be any reason for the exercise by the President of emergency powers delegated to him; that if, when the Legislature could meet and actually is in session, the President is allowed to exercise his delegated legislative powers, there would be the serious anomaly of two legislative bodies acting at the same time, namely, the Legislature and the Executive, “mutually nullifying each other’s action” ; that the limited period fixed in Commonwealth Act No. 671 for its life and effectiveness as required by the Constitution is the interval from the passage of said Act and the moment that Congress could convene, not in special session where its power of legislation is limited by the Chief Executive in his call for special session, but in regular session where it could be free to enact general legislation; and that unless this automatic ending or cessation of Act No. 671 is so held, there would be need of another Act or legislation by the Congress to repeal Act No. 671 in which case, the Chief Executive may by his veto power effectively block any effort in this direction.
I'm still patiently working my way through my free decoupage kit for Easter ... I'm determined to get some good value from a magazine gift for once instead of letting it all go to waste lol!
Ask your students if they think they are lucky, and allow time for sharing. If anyone says that they are NOT lucky, it's time to read aloud one of Dr. Seuss's classics, Did I Ever Tell You How Lucky You Are? By the end of the book, everyone will be giggling, and it will be easy to discuss just how lucky we really are!
Yellow pearls Kaiser craft
My questions to you:
I tried to explain it to Lauren...she was sympathetic and sweet - she didn't say I was insane...which would have been Elie's response. Oh well...I have to learn to just deal with these things and not get so upset (or else, people have to learn not to have medical emergencies near me). Truth is, maybe if that woman (apparently the mother) hadn't been screaming so hysterically, I might have handled it better. On the other hand, I'm beginning to think that had it been me down there - I'd have been screaming just as much.
So why do they do that? A simple answer: It is BDS (Bush Derangement Syndrome). Bush is so hated by many on the Left that they cannot accept any evidence that might support his policies. Their worldview requires that Bush be (as they often say) akin to Hitler and the embodiment of all evil. That he might have had reasonable grounds for his overthrow of two aggressive Islamic regimes (in Afghansistan and Iraq) just cannot be accepted. Rather than accept that it is preferable to believe a total absurdity.
40. She might ask you to buy her a pony on her birthday. Unless you live on a farm, do not buy her a pony on her birthday. It’s OK to rent one though.
Financial Statement Form
This is a good time to enjoy the out-of-doors. As the days get longer and warmer, it is a good time to get active.
Meaning & History
OK…Did you notice?? I cheated there are REALLY eleven quilts in the show…I miss counted and couldn’t decide which quilt got the axe…I hope you didn’t mind the one extra! Think of it as getting an extra scoop of ice cream on your banana split! (Can you tell that I have started another diet?)
Vault Wardens. Dwarf Infantry - S 15cm – F d8 – D d6 – A 4 – M d8 – W 6 – P 11 – Special: Spears
May 03 1:36 PM
I remember reading a piece in the Daily Telegraph years ago (I do love the Daily Telegraph and still lament the passing of its Page Three) which pointed out that the southern bank of the Thames from London Bridge to Deptford – or it might have been Dartford – has been a haunt of dodgy geezers and crime families since Elizabethan times.
Life is an everchanging cycle of events! I am in full remission from my uterine cancer for three years now! I have two more to go and I am considered "cured". I am overwhelmed at God's goodness and graciousness!
The stars will shine brighter than ever
Let's bake!
I carry three flashlights, because I am too poor to buy the LED flashlight that the cops use. One day, when we are out of the recession, I might purchase one with my work salary. I can’t find a job right now, but when times get better, I will find a good job and have plenty of money for supplies.
Now, all I have to do is sit back, wait for about 100 days, and hope that I haven’t killed any more trees.
My husband is honestly the BEST!! He never complains and never cares if he goes without just as long as his family is taken care of and that is why I'm so in LOVE with him. He is seriously the BEST thing that has ever happened to me..
Yesterday, I got some new Copics from iCopic. It was my first time ordering from them and I'm so happy with how fast my order came. I ordered on Friday and it arrived on Monday! So last night I wanted to try out some of my new colors so I stamped TGF's Abbey and colored her bright and fun. I think I could still use some more Copics! Hehe.
O LORD GOD I want to live in Your house all the days of my life, to marvel there at Your Goodness, and to always ask for Your guidance and protection, all to Your Glory in Christ Jesus, Amen!
in a perfect world
For the actual game, I used Sharpies to color each side of a die a different color. When it was your turn, you rolled the die and popped a balloon of the coordinating color. I couldn't find a thumb tack, so we ended up using a sewing pin. A thumb tack with a little handle would have been easier.
a congregation of
And “The Contest” episode was no exception, as they defended a 17 year old high school girl who, outraged by the Obama administration’s bowing to political expedience over solid scientific advise, was on trial for drug trafficking because she chose to buy and resell those “morning after” pills to other female students who were too young to buy them without parental consent. Amazingly enough, they won an acquittal for the girl – something that would never happen in the Ohio I live in, no matter how much I wanted it to!
I hit the 20K mark at 1 hr and 51 min. I was so happy! At this point I thought even if I have to walk the rest of the way, since I haven’t even ran in over two weeks, I would be happy with running 20K in well under 2hrs. But of course I kept going, I was going to give it my all, no matter what!
The various preists and paladins who follow the Light live and work here. It is their central communication point for all who follow teh Light, so they may send their resources across the world to the areas that need it, much like our own Council. Those who have permanent positions in the Cathedral stay in the quarters upstairs, while visitors such as myself are given guest rooms in the lower floors.
Me: Didn't the strawberry contaminate the other fruit?
One of these was the Independent MP Paul Harriss, who had visited Kuching on three recent occasions, where he waspresented as a representative of the Tasmanian Government.
my family
Godinez noted there is no reason for keys at Menard, a maximum security facility, to be turned more than at minimum or medium security facilities.
Who found the whole "re-entry process" to be one of THE most excruciatingly painful things she had to go through in her new relationship with Christ? This sister.
This afternoon I contacted the manufacturer of the product and they have said that will try to get something to me tomorrow, it may not be exactly the same but will be as close to the original specification as possible. I hope they manage to do so as it will restore not my only faith in big businesses but also my daughter’s faith in me.
To teach self-healing techniques through the use of the traditional healing points of acupuncture.
"The Pakistani suppliers have had a good reputation among global sports firms ever since child labor was officially banned here. Children as young as 10 years old used to stitch footballs until there was an international outcry about it. The sports companies, accustomed to nurturing their image with huge sums of money, got worried about their reputation. So they sided with human rights campaigners and exerted pressure. In 1997, Pakistani suppliers and representatives of Unicef and the International Labor Organization signed the Atlanta Agreement in which the industry agreed to stop the use of child labor.
25. Ok, I broke...I checked FB. I had 10 notifications....I feel much better now. Breathe....
First of all, recognize that it's obviously the voice of the enemy trying to discourage you from praying.
Just on a final note, if what conspiracy theorists say are true, then the politicians and ‘men in black’ would be so powerful, and so immoral to do such things, so many people would be in on the secret and to keep them all quiet would be amazing. And for the conspiracy theorists to think they can just see through the veil is ridiculous, and they would be taken out by the ‘men in black’ if there was any truth to what they were saying.
On the job, you are apt to have an extraordinary memory for facts and details, as well as superior powers of observation. Ideally, the work you choose will make use of these vast databanks of knowledge and impressions. In the workplace, you can be excited by the chance to capitalize on opportunities others don’t perceive, and applying information to present or emerging challenges.
Rolling Stones Angel in my heart UK
The biggest selling point is understood to be a voice activated feature called Assistant, stemming from Apple’s acquisition of Siri, a search intelligence startup. The “Let’s talk iPhone” tagline on the invitation could be deciphered as a subtle hint at Assistant.
7. On Tuesday, I was also able to give blood at a local blood drive. Looking over the reading material and seeing all of the ways my blood could be disqualified (I guess that’s what you’d call it), I realized how amazingly blessed I am to have such good health.
And He cares for your needs
Chris: With some fava beans and a nice Chianti.
They are jammin' and it ain't slammin'
The stale smell of apples reminds me of Christmas. When I was a kid, we’d go to Arkansas for Christmas, leaving as soon as Dad got home for work the Friday before Christmas. We’d eat dinner, open our presents, and clap and cheer… and then put them back under the tree and take off for Arkansas on a 24 hour drive where we stopped only for gas and nothing else. Food was packed in the car, and there was always this big bag full of apples. And by the time we got to Arkansas, the whole car had smelled like too-ripe apples, a smell that still gets to me. But that is part of the ghost of Christmas past for me.
The years passed by, and despite remembering the wolverine episode in great detail, I never could recall the name of the series itself, and whenever memories of the episode periodically came to mind I always promised myself that I'd pursue this intriguing little mystery, but somehow I never did. Eventually, even the wolverine episode faded in my recollection until it became little more than a hazy, half-forgotten dream. And although I would often flick through books on vintage television, I never obtained any clues as to its series' identity.
So back to being thankful.... If I can decouple God's love for me with things being easy, then maybe it is okay for me to decouple being thankful from having to feel like things are easy. Maybe it is okay to say, "Today was a really hard day-- and I'm thankful my kids are asleep. I'm thankful for the opportunities I had to grow-- but I'm even more thankful that they have temporarily subsided." :) And maybe it is okay to say, "I am abundantly blessed and tremendously thankful-- and my life is difficult and hard (at least for me) and challenges me to my very core." Being thankful doesn't mean having to ignore the painful and the ugly and pretend they aren't there-- they still are, no matter how grateful you are. For me being thankful is not letting the painful and ugly crowd out the beautiful and sweet. Letting the pain overshadow and drive out the joy is just as untrue as pretending that the pain isn't there in the first place. So maybe I need to add to my goals-- along with peacefuly coexisting with pee-pee-- to learn to peacefully, thankfully coexist with discomfort, but to see it and acknowledge it just the same.
To the territories
268Thy image steals between my God and me,
Still, I met some nice people, and signed a couple more books for the manager and some of her employees. And I have to admit, I do love signing. I wasn’t expecting a mob of people clamoring for my autograph, but during those lengthy times in which no one came into the store, I thought about that scene in This is Spinal Tap and had a good chuckle at my own expense.
of rich new grass the horses nose
There are so many dishes you can make with Kimchi, not only to authentic Korean dishes but also to fuse with other cuisines as well. Possibilities are limitless and creativity is all you need.
Grind the cloves (I used a pestle and mortar)
【sgt.】Formed in 1999 in Tokyo, Japan, the four-piece sgt. utilizes a broad range of genres to create their distinctive sound, including that of post-rock, jazz, ambient and improvisation. Using a guitar, violin, drums and bass guitar, the band creates uplifting instrumental compositions comparable to such acts as “Toe” or “Anoice”.
Maybe they're on vacation, tanning themselves somewhere on the sunny beaches of Hawaii sipping some fruity drink. Huh. Why didn't they invite me?
Who said Angry Birds was so 2011? The undisputed king of mobile gaming has reached new heights by surpassing its own download record.
Well, I can follow the instructions of my favourite sport stars: ‘stay consistent, work hard and give 110%’. In other words, I’m going to work a little harder, check and double check my work and keep trying until I get my mojo back.
I'm tired and don't want to talk to anyone. Yet my daily routine of shuffling kids and women's ministry forces me to interact. So I smile and say, "I'm fine, thank you. How are you?"
First, however, I would like to slice and dice some of the founding documents so that we can see Constitutional reality. For our purposes here, the founding documents can be divided as follows:
Well, I really thought I would have posted about my big 27 month old by now, but I've been busy w/ other stuff.
I have tons of orders for these coming up for Valentines Day from all the guys in my office. I'm going to be one busy girl! I even have an order for a full dozen! Hmmmm.........sounds special.......maybe like a proposal? I'm charging them a ton, but you can make your own!..............
The cost is €1550 per person per single occupancy or €1450 per person per double occupancy. This includes all meals and wines with meals; only tap water because we are against bottled water; two drinks at the Bonaparte; one drink after dinner; one coffee at the cafes we stop at; and small gifts that Francois will organise.
Urad dal ---------------- 2 spoon
-The warmth coming off of the electronics and robotics.
This baby grows into Om Kapoor; a spoilt self-indulgent actor resting on his father’s laurels and a trial to all who know him. Adored by his fans, he feels that he can do no wrong until he remembers his past life, grows up a little and resolves to bring about justice for his lost love, Shantipriya.
Importantly, the large and sophisticated Canadian pension funds will only pay external managers for alpha they cannot reproduce internally. And even then, they use their size and clout to lower fees, making sure they get the best possible deal.
as i renovated my house - i got to choose the best of the best sheet rock, wires for eclectic, where my outlets needs to be, what insulation to use, ect. - i had the ability to make sure my house was re-built with the best of the best - instead of the cheapest materials that aren't worth a damn - and i didn't rob any ones land!
supplies used: scor-tape, ATG, glue dots, distress tool, Tea Dye Distress Ink, StazOn, StarDust Stickles, Ranger SuperFine Detail Gold EP, Sizzix Branch with Leaves, Spellbinders Labels 2,smallest, MS Eyelet Lace Punch
All stamps, inks and papers are CTMH.
So no more You and Me blog... no more twitter, etc. I just can't hang!! It was very hard trying to decide what to eliminate but I have never really felt "comfortable" blogging about my kids. I'm such a paranoid person... that every time I click "publish post" I would just cringe and pray that no crazies have wondered here. That's also a big reason I will be ending this blog... I thankfully have NEVER had an issue with my blog and the crazies... but it always had me worried. That is another main concern. So there is just so much thought put into this decision and it's clear the best thing for me is to end You and Me Blog. It's time for me to move on.
was alone in the courtyard. ‘Was the stress too much for her?’ Her
Whisk together the contents of the
A few weeks back, I shared with you my love for using our fireplace. I've used it a bunch since, but it was starting to get expensive as I was buying bundles of wood for $6 each at the local convenience store. Paul decided it was time to order wood to lower the cost per fire. Well, tonight that wood was delivered. The problem? The "company" my darling hubs found on Craigslist wouldn't stack the wood because we didn't have a wheel barrow. You would think a company that moves wood, would have their own tools. Maybe that's just me. Anywho, long story short, the hubs and I got to DIY once again and stack our own wood.
S managed to calm T down and the rest of us--dazed and shaken and still kind of confused--went back to bed. The next morning, once we were all fully awake, we discussed the events of the night until all of us were doubled over and sobbing with laughter.
407,000 books were published in 2007.
"human mic" discusses the international links of the movement: not just the US, but slavery, colonialism, imperialism "without which it wouldn't be"
You don’t even have to burrow into yesterday’s budget fine print to discover the “climate revenues” section, where the White House discloses that it expects $78.7 billion in new tax revenue in 2012 from its cap-and-trade program. The pot of cash grows to $237 billion through 2014, and at least $646 billion through 2019. If this isn’t tax revenue, what is it? Manna from heaven? The offset from Al Gore’s carbon footprint?
Electric Blanket Swim Competition
Greer seems to acknowledge this to some extent when she asks, 'Why did Monica Ali's book have to be called Brick Lane?' seeming to imply that she should have given it some other, fictional name. But the Brick Lane of the novel is the Brick Lane of a novelist's mind and claiming to be nothing else, and the trouble only comes when people fail to read it in this way.
Hey, speaking of... I saw on Facebook that one of my dear readers, inspired by my Purgefest 2010, is having her own Purgefest 2011. Awesome! I'm so proud! It feels so good to get rid of crap. I'm down to the bare bones myself--which feels fantastic--but my husband is a different story. He's making progress, though; we can almost fit my car (which is roughly the size of a coffee table) in the (three-car) garage. Just saw this on Facebook a couple of minutes ago. How a propos.
Where are you finding these gorgeous clothes??
The legal definition: When you are so hungry that your lack of food causes you to become angry, frustrated or both.
Unless the precise tone is right, grey has a dampening effect on other colours used with it. Heavy use of grey usually indicates a lack of confidence and fear of exposure.
Update: 1/13/12
Sustenance Group’s Kristi Wooten and Nancy Bauer were invited to attend a special reception for Heifer International CEO Pierre Ferrari as part of The Galloway School’s innovative year-long service learning project to benefit the nonprofit.
Although, since waking, I’ve had a strange feeling. An urge to be at work. It’s like I’ve gotten the days wrong and I’m currently supposed to be at work. I’ve had to check the date several times just to assure myself that it is Thursday. I’ve had to check my roster several times just to assure myself I’m not supposed to be at work on Thursday.
"Fascinating son."
1800 Mattress Review (1800mattressreview.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
This post really sucks to write. I just want to get it over with.
Now our other kitties need their annual check-ups. *sigh*
guess time flies when you`re having fun.
The end of this gruesome and psychopathic history of armed attacks and war-murders in the Orwellian names of unalienable rights and freedom will end upon the demand of enough in the 99% to arrest the obvious current War Criminals.
Mr. Southbay and I have been going back and forth on names..it hasn't been easy! So, we made a list with our recent list of possibilities! I'm sure that list will be changing... but nonetheless, we are excited to see what people vote for..we made it public to all thebump.com users! I think in the end, we won't announce our decision till the birth of our Little Darling. We must keep something a surprise :)
But, Barack Obama is failing. Failing big. Failing fast. And failing everywhere: foreign policy, domestic initiatives, and most importantly, in forging connections with the American people. The incomparable Dorothy Rabinowitz in the Wall Street Journal put her finger on it: He is failing because he has no understanding of the American people, and may indeed loathe them. Fred Barnes of the Weekly Standard says he is failing because he has lost control of his message, and is overexposed. Clarice Feldman of American Thinker produced a dispositive commentary showing that Obama is failing because fundamentally he is neither smart nor articulate; his intellectual dishonesty is conspicuous by its audacity and lack of shame.
The training that bodybuilders endure will not cause their joints to become weaker. The muscles surrounding them will become stronger and bigger to help protect the joints. Other supplements that these athletes use, such as fish oil capsules and multi vitamins, will also help lubricate the joints to keep them healthy.
A tsundere is a character who is both ’tsuntsun,’ (aloof) and ‘deredere,’ (sweet). While most anime and manga fans associate the term tsundere with female characters like Haruhi (The Melancholy of Haruhi Suzumiya) and Taiga (Toradora), many male love interests in shojo series also have tsundere qualities. Some of them are cold and gradually warm up over the course of the series (usually because of the main female character), while others seem hotblooded yet are actually shy. Because of this range in tsundere personality types, I feel as though the following male tsunderes are sliding on a scale from cold to hot. Of course, this is all my personal opinion, and some of the characters I’ve listed I’ve never seen labeled as tsundere yet I feel fit right in.
Wash off . Regular use will lightens the skin blemishes and scar.
A couple weeks ago I was shopping for shoes to wear for an event that didn't involve the harp. So I could get shoes without straps, right? Wrong. I tried on every single pair of chunky-heeled pumps in Minneapolis. And not one single pair would stay on my feet when I walked. No amount of doctoring helped, either - ball of foot pads, heel grips, total inserts, all three - my heels slipped right out. As I said, I have small feet and I was trying on size 6 shoes (the smallest size available) - but what's UP? Have my feet shrunk? Have shoes sizes gone up slightly?
It ain't due out until 2012.
Probably the most famous cocktail invented by Don the Beachcomber during the post World-War II tiki explosion. (I especially enjoy the phrase "tiki explosion".) There are a lot of bad zombie variations out there, but the Anvil has got it right. (And if the original version is a little too sweet for you, I've heard you can get one made with Fernet Branca. Iiiinteresting.) At least half the fun of ordering any drink at the Anvil is watching all the artistry that goes into making it, and this one is especially enjoyable, since this delicious, rummy bit of cocktail history contains about 52 different ingredients. Of course, since so much work goes into making this drink, if you order one on a busy night your bartender will probably hate you. Save this one for a weeknight. And don't forget to leave a nice big tip.
After the Block and a few minutes to stretch our legs, it was time to settle in for the movie I was most looking forward to seeing at this year's festival - The Whisperer in Darkness (dir. Sean Branney).
Wish I had some pictures for this, but...we were busy!
I loved Mike. He was lovely, and hey, DRUMMERS ARE COOL TOO! Just fyi. I loved how he was so determined to make increase Zero's self-esteem and how much he cared about her. The body-image stuff with Zero was really interesting, especially how it was portrayed. I liked that it wasn't one of "those big issues" like eating disorders, but instead was dealt with in a realistic, more refreshing way. Zero herself was a really strong female character, very angsty! AND OMG YOU GUYS THERE WASN'T ANY INSTA-LOVE! Woo!
What is your favorite product to use on your projects? Oh my favorite product is 3D dots, Gems, and Ribbon. I love the effect you get with 3D dots and the Gems and Ribbon always add that extra touch.
Jonathan's story is consistent with others from Luoyang. "Kate" adopted her daughter from Luoyang in 2010, along with a deaf child from the Beijing orphanage. Kate's Luoyang daughter also opened up and revealed that her birth family had also been approached by officials who discussed relinquishing her. Two days before Kate finalized the adoption, and when Kate was already in the Province to finalize her adoption, the Luoyang orphanage still did not have the relinquishment paperwork signed by the birth family. To increase the pressure on the grandmother to sign the required paperwork, the orphanage took Kate's daughter on a two-hour drive to her grandmother's house. The orphanage needed the grandmother to sign papers relinquishing her grand-daughter so that the adoption could be finalized. With Kate in the area, time was running out.
Rembrandt died poor. He’s now regarded as one of the creative geniuses of the art world. This stuff has been going on forever. In ancient times the people who carved the famous statues in Greece didn’t even put their names on their work. Creativity has never been as useful to humans or held as high a value as the ability to make money, to manipulate others, to convince the masses that one is a god, etc.
During the course of the trip, the Minister said he met over 100 people and addressed over 1,000 people at evening evening events in New Delhi, Kolkata and Mumbai.
The sky with its radiant blue glow, reminds me that there is no limit to where we can go. The birds remind me of how I one day want to have my own wings and soar through the sky and feel free and be free of this world.
“Linden. Cal Peters saw it. He said he saw someone hit by a stun gun a few years ago and the man looked just like Mr. Sanders—jerking around like he couldn’t control his muscles. Lila Omion said you weren’t in class and you came out of the building with them, so everyone’s thinking Major Cornwell had something to do with it.”
Like flipping a switch, Lucy turned on the waterworks. Tears filled her eyes as she kicked her legs and whined.
Some of you fought on a distant beach.
Ink: Walnut Stain distress ink, copic markers
"And you used to have such misgivings about being married!"
Make the best of what you have. Whenever I’m feeling hopeless or disillusioned, that phrase is my mantra. I’m wondering if there’s a way to turn my abuse into something positive. After all, it’s the only childhood I’ll ever get. There are no do-overs. I won’t ever know what a different childhood will feel like.
I’d left early that morning for a meeting 45 minutes away, with no plan to return for the better part of the day. Since my mother wasn’t yet up, I locked the house behind me, never thinking that I had not left a key inside for her.
It has long been one world. Social, political, and economic trends emerge across the developed nations, denying the existence of borders, varied cultures and languages. For a powerful analysis of one such period see Three New Deals by Wolfgang Schivelbusch, “Reflections on Roosevelt’s America, Mussolini’s Italy, and Hitler’s Germany, 1933-1939″. In many ways three (4, including Japan) different revolutions, but with profound commonalities.
I think this might be my second Elizabeth Berg book? I feel the same about all her books though. I'm also pretty sure I came upon both in the same manner. Every year, my mother-in-law helps with a big book sale for charity (I think that's what it is at least). I'm not sure, but I think all the leftover books get divided up and somehow I always end up getting a giant box of free books at Christmas. The box of books is always addressed to my sister-in-law Kathleen and me - both of us are avid readers. We typically just pull a book out each and as long as we haven't read them, keep the one we happened to have pulled out, then keep going until the box is empty. We both end up with something like 10 new books per year in this manner. It's great. But it can make for a weird, mixed bag of books.
There’s the 1950s-style love ballad of “Christmas Morning,” the Ramones stylings of “Christmas Day (I Wish I Was Surfing),” the synth pop of “Home for the Holidays,” the New Wave novelty of “Zombie Christmas” and the pure cartoon pop of “Jesus the Reindeer”— among other sounds — that pile on for one of the more diverse Christmas experiences you’ll find without taxing the tolerance of numerous listeners.
And then the actual race, of course.
I am pretty drawn to it too.
1908 update:
Deputy Joan Burton: ￼ ￼ Why do you not withdraw it?
Crumbly Apple Pie Bites
The compote will keep in the fridge for up to 1 week.
20th: 날아라 펭귄 (Nal-a-ra Peng-gwin/Fly, Penguin, 2009)
26 of 28 people found the following review helpful.
For the first 2 bands on the Friday night – The Ideal Crash and Sweet Relief - I was thinking about camera angles and shots that might make a reasonable newspaper image – nothing too fancy, just something that reports what’s going on.
Busy seems to be my middle name lately, as I'm sure it is with all of you. One holiday down and only about 5-6 weeks to go until normalcy returns. Thank God we haven't had any snow yet, that always seems to hamper my plans. It seems there is something I must have immediately as the days go on, or things I think of, or run out of, or something or another, and clear weather makes it easier just to jump in the car and go without thinking.
It’s safe to say I use Twitter a lot more than it’s humanly acceptable to do so (you can follow me HERE by the way). It gives me something to read during college breaks when I have a few minutes to kill and it’s a great platform for venting to yourself when something goes pear-shaped. I also use it for a lot of music-related purposes, whether that be to get news updates on albums, shows etc. or just to see what the people behind the music are doing, thinking, talking about, whatever. One of the people I follow is Josh Franceschi, frontman of leading British rock band You Me At Six. He seems to be a fairly charming chap, but whenever ever there’s something he feels strongly about, usually relating to some sort of backlash to either him, his band or his music, he’ll be quick to take to Twitter to express his own, often fiery opinions on the matter. A few weeks back just one of those instances occurred, when he called out indie rock duo Blood Red Shoes for calling his band ‘terrible’. Since then the tweets in response to BRS have been deleted, but before writing this little scuffle off as the result of one member of a band throwing his toys out of the pram, let’s look into just what it was that the band said about him and his cohorts.
Does the stereotype image of a “man” come between justice and the silent sufferer?
Each episode will feature an on-the-job interview with some of New York’s quintessential residents – a tugboat captain, a street artist, a location scout, a pizzeria owner...
The techno-Barsoomians chose an aggressive plan of action. All children would be placed in a state-controlled crèche immediately after birth where they would be educated according to their demonstrated abilities, similar to the German Hauptschule-Realschule-Gymnasium system, with all education geared toward creating a survival plan for their species. Well, their tribe, anyway. Various lines of thought were pursued in search of a satisfactory survival solution but finally a serendipitous breakthrough in spaceflight technology pushed them toward pursuing an off-planet scheme.
My parents and sister all contributed in countless ways to the project itself, but also in just encouraging me along the way. They all told me that they enjoyed reading the book and said it wasn’t as dry as some history books can be – and I didn’t even pay them to say that!
Yesterday was the first day back into running since the London Marathon, an easy 1.74 miles around a park near Chris’ house. He also came along and we decided to head in different directions, meet in the middle and then at the end.
After much deliberation the winners of the 2011 viva la roja mierda end of year awards have finally been decided with Universidad de Chile capping off an impressive years by dominating the award winners.
Islamic swimsuits are EXPENSIVE. At least to frugal ol' me. Any piece of clothing I purchase is within the $5-$30 range with very few exceptions for special occasions or outerwear (coats). I had a bikini back in high school that actually cost $80. My mom bought it for me for Easter though. Even she was upset with the cost but it was literally the only one that fit me right and covered enough for us both (me and my mother) to be comfortable. After that experience, bikini buying fell to me, and I probably never spent over $40 myself.
What equipment is provided and by whom (at the other location)
The tea-light candles were set up perfectly along the bridge.
They might as well be words from a dead language in today’s world.
The history of banning things is admittedly inglorious.
Maybe this is a sign - a sign from somebody or something - I don't know? I'll bring it back, bring the typewriter back and think about this little act over again shall I? Is attempting to drown words an act of mercy or some sort of verbal, brutal slaying?!
roll their shit in little balls.
Chekhov is known as the master of the short story, and after reading these five stories, it is easy to see why. Each story is exquisitely crafted and nearly flawless. Chekhov writes with such precision, especially when describing the natural world. His words perfectly evoke the scene: a garden in flower; a riverbank; an avenue of trees; a field just before a rainstorm; the sea.
Oh, one more word...well, really, this one would be a note. Here's a Proper Noun song:
When the daughter arrived home, the robbers overpowered her, tied her up and began raping her.
Dante Hicks (Brian O’Halloran) is a clerk at the Quick Stop, a local convenience store in Leonardo, New Jersey. On his day off, his boss calls him in to cover a few hours for another employee who is sick. Arriving at the store, the security shutters are jammed closed, so Dante hangs a blanket over them with a message in shoe polish: “I assure you; we’re open.”
Each step of the way, they had to listen to God.
Let me know if you anything looks weird, or if I should change anything! I noticed I may have made the pieces too big? or the top pieces don’t look high enough? I probably won’t change it though, as I’ve already covered it and almost finished it. I do know that there is a diamond shape missing on the nose of the head. It will be added!
We would like to feature you in our Best of the Web, our weekly series recognizing the most interesting websites on the web. We are always looking to feature new sites that have content relevant to our readers."
The most important thing about the candy you choose to put in it is to make sure you notched out the Sweet Treat cup enough but not too much for you candy to fall through to the mechanism. The mechanism is a pain in the rear to make and you also have to make sure you tuck in that paper just right so it can catch the right size of candy you have chose. Don't ask me how I know this is important...LOL.
this, when a core focus of
I still struggle with the fact that my husband was THAT guy. That he cheated on me with HER. With all the hormones flying around my body at the moment its like all those emotions and feelings are intensified even more. In the past few months I’ve been able to go for whole days without thinking about what happened and rather focus on the future. But since falling pregnant its like it pops into my head constantly. And it makes me sad and angry and frustrated and hurt and everything – all over again.
Prime Minister knows that if they attack before November, Obama will have no choice but to give them full support (including military, which is the only one that counts), something that is not necessarily true by 2013.
Hesper Payne: The Strange Tale of Samuel Gonzalez (2012)
A while back, a friend of a friend asked me to make a Hello Kitty cake for a bridal shower she was throwing. It turned out that I went to highschool with her! Then it turned out that she has another friend, who I went to highschool with, who was interested in having me make cookie favors for her son's first birthday party! What a small world!
2. Why is it that the more kids you have (and the earlier you have them), the less risk you have for getting ovarian cancer? (Apparently, I’ll be getting ovarian cancer within the next few days.)
i remember when Gaza strip was terrorised by the israelis..
The heroes engaged in a battle against the Hulk, and soon learned the truth. They then engaged in a titanic struggle against the god of mischief and won. Four issues later Captain America was found floating in the ice in the Arctic Circle. The Sentinel of Liberty was alive and only needed to be revived. He was thawed out and joined the Avengers in battle against Namor. After that battle, Steve, Tony and Thor swore an oath on Mjolnir that if ever any of them were summoned they would respond.
J and I have holidayed abroad, we've been to parties, we've had some fantastic nights out and weekends away. I've bought clothes and make-up and perfume aswell as things for the house, and saved up the deposit to buy the house that they would go in.
The question is what is NATO afraid of? Have they made that many enemies? If they are so concerned about security then why don’t they have their summit at some secure underground bases somewhere because God knows there are plenty of them.
Then hot geriatric love with the love of my life for the last several decades will commence.
Since You have regarded me,
A regular “column” in More magazine is one where they list some Man Facts! A couple of weeks ago this little gem of a “man-fact” cropped up.
